<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89131-0031 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-31-89.f2.A1030</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4702"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 19 / Tuesday, January 31, 1989/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="1">Vol. 54, No. 19 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Tuesday, January 31, 1989</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Agricultural Marketing Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">7 CFR Part 949</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. FV-AO-88-2; AMS-FV-88-034 PD]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Texas-New Mexico High Plains Potatoes; Recommended Decision and OpportunityTo File Written Exceptions to Proposed Marketing Agreement and Order</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Agricultural Marketing Service, USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This recommended decision proposes a marketing agreementand order regulating the handling of potatoes grown in the High Plainsarea of Texas and New Mexico. Interested persons may file written exceptionsconcerning the recommendations made in this recommended decision. The proposedorder would authorize regulations to establish grade, size, quality, maturity,pack, container and marking standards for Irish potatoes grown in 21 designatedcounties in Texas and 10 designated counties in New Mexico. The programwould be administered by a committee of six producers, four handlers anda public member, and would be financed by assessments levied on potatohandlers. The primary objective of the program would be to improve thequality of potatoes shipped to fresh markets. This should reduce marketinglosses, improve quality for consumers, and result in improved returns togrowers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Written exceptions to this recommended decision must bereceived by March 2, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Four copies of written exceptions should be sent tothe Hearing Clerk, Room 1079, South Building, U.S. Department of Agriculture,Washington, DC 20250. All written submissions will be made available forpublic inspection at the office of the Hearing Clerk during regular businesshours [7 CFR 1.27(b)].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Robert F. Matthews, MarketingSpecialist, Marketing Order Administration Branch, Fruit and VegetableDivision, AMS, USDA, P.O. Box 96456, Room 2525-S, Washington, DC 20090-6456,telephone 202-447-2431.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>Prior documents in this proceeding:Notice of Hearing_Issued March 30, 1988, and published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on April 4, 1988 [53 FR 10887]. <ITAG tagnum="84">Preliminary Statement </ITAG>This administrative action is governed by the provisions of sections 556and 557 of Title 5 of the United States Code, and therefore is excludedfrom the requirements of Executive Order 12291.Notice is hereby given of the filing with the Hearing Clerk of this recommendeddecision with respect to a proposed marketing agreement and order regulatingthe handling of potatoes grown in a designated area of Texas and New Mexico.This recommended decision and opportunity to file exceptions is issuedpursuant to the provisions of the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Actof 1937, as amended [7 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>], hereinafter referred to as the ``Act'', and the applicablerules of practice and procedure governing the formulation of marketingagreements and marketing orders [7 CFR Part 900]. The proposed marketing agreement and order were formulated on the recordof a public hearing held at Hereford, Texas on April 19, 1988. Notice ofthe hearing was published in the April 4, 1988, issue of the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>The notice set forth a proposed order submittedby the Texas-New Mexico Potato Committee on behalf of potato producersand handlers in the proposed production area.<ITAG tagnum="84">Small Business Consideration</ITAG>In accordance with the provisions of the Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA)[5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>], the Administrator of the Agricultural Marketing Servicehas determined that this action would not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. Small agricultural producershave been defined by the Small Business Administration (SBA) [13 CFR 121.2]as those having average annual gross revenues for the last three yearsof less than $500,000. Small agricultural service firms, which would includehandlers under this proposed order, are defined as those with gross annualrevenues of less than $3.5 million. The purpose of the RFA is to fit regulatory actions to the scale of businesssubject to such actions in order that small businesses will not be undulyor disproportionately burdened. Marketing orders and rules issued thereunderare unique in that they are brought about through group action of essentiallysmall entities for their own benefit. Thus, both the RFA and the Act havesmall entity orientation and compatibility. Interested persons were invitedto present evidence at the hearing on the probable economic impact thatthe proposed order would have on small businesses.The record indicates that there are approximately 30 handlers of potatoesin the High Plains area, who handled 2,848,000 hundredweight of potatoesfor fresh market in 1986 with an estimated crop value of about $26.3 million.While there is a variance in size of individual handler operations, most,if not all, of the handlers that would be regulated under this proposedorder would qualify as small firms under SBA's definition. Likewise, themajority of the 110 potato growers in the High Plains area could be classifiedas small businesses.While the order recommended herein would likely impose regulations on handlers,the burden of these regulatory requirements should not be significant comparedto the benefits which should accrue to such businesses. The expected impacton persons acting in a handling capacity who could be classified as smallbusinesses is discussed in detail elsewhere in this recommended decision.In summary, the testimony is that the order should be operated in as efficientand economical a manner as will tend to effectuate the declared policyof the Act. In this way all entities, small and large, would be subjectto minimal regulatory requirements as a result of the order. However, asdiscussed in the material issues, the proposed order would contain theauthority to exempt from regulation special purpose shipments, as wellas minimum quantities, and the order should be operated in a way that wouldincorporate sound business practices and efficiencies which would minimizethe burden on all regulated business entities.The Act does not authorize the regulation of growers. However, some impactupon growers is likely. Regulations promulgated under the proposed ordercould be expected to remove from fresh market channels less desirable gradesand sizes of potatoes and divert them to other outlets, such as livestockfeed. The record indicates that an extensive cattle-feeding industry existswithin the proposed production area which serves as an outlet for culls,or low grade potatoes. Moreover, as the lower grades and smaller sizesare removed from fresh market channels, prices to growers for the resultinghigher quality supplies should increase reflecting consumer preferencefor this level of quality. This should outweigh any loss to growers forcull potatoes, since such quality even on the fresh market historicallyreturns little or nothing to the producer.Although a somewhat larger proportion of a producer's potatoes may be marketedin secondary outlets at a lower price, the greater part of production,which includes the higher or fresh market grades, should yield a greaterreturn. Thus, the proposed order could be expected to have a positive impacton grower returns.The impact of the proposed order upon handlers is also expected to be positive.Most handlers perform their services for an established fee based on thequantity of potatoes handled for a producer. It is anticipated that mostpotatoes shipped to fresh market will be required to meet certain qualityand size requirements. It is also expected that an expansion of existingmarkets and the development of new ones will result from the increase inquality.Further, testimony indicated that the burden placed on handlers by theproposed order with respect to reporting and recordkeeping requirementswould be negligible. Most of the information that would be reported tothe committee is already compiled by handlers for other uses and is readilyavailable. In compliance with Office of Management and Budget (OMB) regulations[5 CFR Part 1320] which implement the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 [44U.S.C. Chapter 35] and andSection; 3504(h) of that Act, the information collectionand recordkeeping requirements that may be imposed by this proposed orderwould be submitted to OMB for approval. These requirements would not becomeeffective prior to OMB approval. Any requirements imposed would be evaluatedagainst the potential benefits to be derived, and any added burden resultingfrom increased recordkeeping would not be significant when compared tothose anticipated benefits.Reporting and recordkeeping requirements issued under comparable potatomarketing order programs impose an average annual burden on each regulatedhandler of about four hours. It is reasonable to expect that a comparableburden may be imposed under this proposed order on the estimated 30 handlersof High Plains potatoes.The Act requires that prior to the issuance of a marketing order, a referendumbe conducted of affected producers to determine whether they approve ofthe order. The ballot material that may be used in conducting a referendumon this proposed order for High Plains potatoes has been submitted to OMBfor approval. It has been estimated that it would take an average of 10minutes for each of the approximately 110 potato growers to participatein the voluntary referendum balloting.In determining that the proposed order would not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities, all of the issues discussedabove were considered. The proposed order provisions have been carefullyreviewed and every effort has been made to eliminate any unnecessary costsor requirements. Although the order may impose some additional costs andrequirements on handlers, it is anticipated that the programs under theproposed order would help to increase demand for potatoes grown in theHigh Plains area. Therefore, any additional costs should be offset by thebenefits derived from expanded markets and sales benefiting handlers andproducers alike.Accordingly, it is determined that the proposed marketing order would nothave a significant impact on small handlers or producers. Moreover, asdiscussed in material issue (3)(below), potatoes grown in more than oneState would be regulated under the proposed order in order to effectuatethe declared purposes of the Act. Thus, any marketing orders, or theirequivalent, authorized under respective State statutes could not achievethe same results as an alternative to a Federal marketing order.<ITAG tagnum="84">Material Issues</ITAG>The material issues presented on the record of the hearing are as follows:(1) Whether the handling of potatoes in the proposed production area isin the current of interstate or foreign commerce, or directly burdens,obstructs, or affects such commerce;(2) Whether the economic and marketing conditions are such that they justifya need for a marketing agreement and order which will tend to effectuatethe declared policy of the Act.(3) What the definition of the commodity and the production area to becovered by the proposed order should be;(4) What the identity of the persons and the marketing transactions tobe regulated should be; and(5) What the specific terms and provisions of the proposed order shouldbe including;(a) The definitions of terms used therein which are necessary and incidentalto attain the declared policy and objectives of the Act;(b) The establishment, maintenance, composition, procedures, powers, duties,and operation of a committee which shall be the local administrative agencyfor assisting the Secretary in the administration of the proposed order;(c) The authority to incur expenses and the procedure to levy assessmentson handlers to obtain revenue for paying such expenses;(d) The authority to establish production and marketing research, and marketdevelopment projects;(e) The method of regulating the handling of potatoes grown in the productionarea;(f) The authority for inspection and certification of shipments;(g) The establishment of requirements for handler reporting and recordkeeping;(h) The requirement of compliance with all provisions of the proposed orderand with regulations issued under it; and(i) Additional terms and conditions as set forth in andSection;andSection;949.82 through 949.92 of the Notice of Hearing published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of April 4, 1988 [53 FR 10887] which are commonto all marketing agreements and marketing orders, and other terms and conditionspublished as andSection;andSection; 949.97 through 949.99 which are commonto marketing agreements only.<ITAG tagnum="84">Findings and Conclusions</ITAG>The following findings and conclusions on the material issues are basedon the record of the hearing:(1) Potatoes are an agricultural commodity within the group named in theAct to which its marketing regulatory authority may be applied. They arean important commercial vegetable crop in Texas and New Mexico. The Texas-NewMexico summer crop of potatoes is primarily grown in the production area,as defined in the proposed order. The area includes the High Plains areaof the Texas panhandle and eastern New Mexico. Data published by the NewMexico and Texas Departments of Agriculture show that growers in the HighPlains area produced a summer-season potato crop in 1986 of 4 million hundredweightwhich had a farm value of $32.1 million.The record indicates that potato harvest in the Texas portion of the productionarea begins in late June and continues into November, although weatherconditions may result in some variation in harvest timing. The peak harvestperiod is early July through August. Harvest in New Mexico begins two weekslater, with the most active period from mid-July through mid-October. Therecord shows that production area potatoes move to nearby wholesale andretail outlets within the production area, and to such outlets in otherparts of Texas and New Mexico and in other States.A large portion of the potatoes grown in the proposed production area ismarketed outside of that area. USDA Market News reports show that in 1986,there were 821,000 hundredweight of Texas and New Mexico potatoes unloadedin the leading 22 major U.S. markets. Dallas, Texas (which is outside theproduction area) accounted for 32 percent of the total reported Texas potatounloads and 61 percent of unloads reported from New Mexico. Substantialquantities of potatoes grown in the High Plains region were also reportedin numerous markets in other States, such as Atlanta in the Southeast;New York City, Boston, Pittsburgh, and Baltimore in the East; Chicago andSt. Louis in the Midwest; and New Orleans in the South. Some potatoes alsomoved to Western markets, including Los Angeles and Denver.Record evidence shows that the High Plains area is an important domesticsupplier of potatoes each year. For a brief period of several weeks inlate June and early July, at the beginning of its season, there is littlecompetition from other domestic areas in its major markets. However, HighPlains producers encounter significant competition during most of the shippingseason from potatoes grown in Washington and Colorado, where harvest beginssoon after that in the proposed production area. Shipments of potatoesfrom Washington and Colorado are in large volume during the latter partof the Texas-New Mexico marketing period, and provide strong competitionin most markets outside of Texas.Record evidence shows that the Texas-New Mexico High Plains potato industry'smarket is the entire United States, and its members are in daily contactwith buyers across the Nation. With modern communication and transportationsystems, potato supplies and prices in any one location are promptly knownelsewhere and have a direct effect on potato supplies and prices in allother locations. Record evidence also shows that these potatoes are shippedin foreign commerce.There are few differences in sales between potatoes for use within theproduction area as compared with potatoes sold for use in other parts ofthe United States or other countries. If a program regulating only shipmentsto markets outside the production area were to be made effective, the marketfor potatoes within the production area would likely be overburdened withunregulated, lower quality potatoes resulting in unduly lower prices inthe area. In turn, this would affect prices in other parts of Texas andNew Mexico, and in other States. The evidence of record is that all movementof potatoes in marketing channels is inextricably intermingled and in directcompetition, and hence it is concluded that the handling of potatoes grownwithin the production area is either in the current of interstate or foreigncommerce or directly burdens, obstructs or affects such commerce. Hence,except as hereinafter otherwise provided, all handling of potatoes grownin the production area should be subject to the proposed order.(2) The need for the proposed regulatory program for Texas-New Mexico HighPlains potatoes is supported by the evidence in the record of hearing.Irish potatoes are an important vegetable crop in the United States andare unique in that they are grown commercially in nearly every State. In1986, the last year for which complete statistics are available, 1.22 millionacres were harvested and U.S. production totalled 362 million hundredweight.The value of the crop was an estimated $1.8 billion. Over half the potatoessold (59 percent) were sold to processors. Thirty-four percent was soldin fresh market channels, and the remaining 7 percent was sold for seedor livestock feed.The U.S. potato crop is classified by four seasonal groupings accordingto the time of the harvest. The fall crop, harvested from October throughDecember, is by far the largest and in 1986 accounted for almost 90 percentof total production. This crop is produced in the northern tier of States.Leading producers are Idaho, Washington, Minnesota, North Dakota, Oregonand Maine. The fall crop is referred to as a storage crop and with modernstorage practices and facilities, supplies potatoes virtually all yearround.The winter crop, harvested from January through March, is grown primarilyin Southern California and Southern Florida. This is the smallest cropof the four since it follows closely on large storage crop supplies thatare usually ample. In addition, most crop land available for use duringthe cold months is planted to crops yielding a higher dollar crop. The1986 winter crop was just under 3 million hundredweight, about average.The spring crop is harvested from April through June. States shipping themost significant volume during this period are California, Florida and,toward the end of spring, North Carolina. In 1986 this crop totaled nearly20 million hundredweight.The summer season consists of the months of July through September. In1986, the summer crop totaled nearly 21 million hundredweight. Leadingproducers were California, Colorado, New Jersey and the High Plains ofTexas and New Mexico. Potatoes grown in the proposed production area accountedfor about 20 percent of the 1986 summer crop and about 1 percent of totalU.S. production.According to the record, the origin of commercial potato production inthe High Plains of Texas and New Mexico is uncertain, but one witness recalledgrowing potatoes as early as 1940. One of the major turning points in theTexas-New Mexico High Plains potato industry occurred about 20 years agowith the introduction of sprinkler irrigation. Until then, all of the potatoeswere furrow irrigated, and potato production was restricted to heaviersoils. On the lighter, sandier soils common in the proposed productionarea, irrigation water could not reach the end of the furrow. With thedevelopment of sprinkler irrigation, potato production shifted to the lightersoils of the High Plains area which are more suitable for the productionof quality potatoes. The area of production also greatly expanded to includethe Clovis area of New Mexico and the Seminole, Texas area to the south.Production of potatoes in the proposed production area, as indicated byState data for the Texas and New Mexico summer potato crop, has trendedupward during the last decade. During the five-year period 1977-81, potatoacreage harvested in the Texas High Plains area averaged 9,280 acres andproduction averaged 2,067,000 hundredweight. However, during the period1982-86 average acreage harvested had increased 11 percent to 10,340 acresand average production had increased 20 percent to 2,474,000 hundredweight.Likewise, during the 1977-81 period, New Mexico High Plains producers harvestedan average of 2,648 acres and produced an average of 593,200 hundredweightof potatoes. During the five-year period 1982-86, average acreage was up91 percent to 5,070 acres and average production rose 131 percent to 1,373,000hundredweight. Increasing acreage was primarily responsible for the expansionthat took place during this time.The record indicates that while total average acreage in the High Plainsarea increased 29 percent and average produciton rose 45 percent duringthis time period, acreage has shown signs of stabilizing and productionhas levelled off. In the years 1984, 1985 and 1986, harvested acreage hastotalled 17,000, 19,750 and 15,350 acres respectively. Production duringthe same three years was 4,392,500 hundredweight, 4,729,300 hundredweight,and 4,044,600 hundredweight.Witnesses testified that planting of the High Plains potato crop beginsas early as February and extends to mid-April. The principal variety grownis the Norgold Russet. Some red potatoes are also produced, including theRed Lasoda and Viking varieties. Seed is purchased primarily from northernproducing States. The record indicates that only a limited amount of breedingresearch has been undertaken to develop varieties specifically suited tothe unique growing conditions of the High Plains. At present, however,growers in the area are dependent upon varieties developed for use in otherproduction areas. Production research is needed to develop new varietiesable to produce large, high quality crops, under the hot summers prevalentin the proposed production area. Evidence also supports research to developbetter methods of dealing with heat stress at harvest time and when thepotoatoes are shipped. Also, because the costs associated with productionkeep rising, more research is needed to find ways of reducing those costs.As with other potato producing areas, the cost of production for the HighPlains has trended upward. A study by the Texas Agricultural Market Centerat College Station, Texas, presented at the hearing provided some comparativecost information. According to this study, in 1980 the cost to producean acre of potatoes in the High Plains was $1,123 for variable costs and$87 for fixed costs, for a total cost of $1,210 per acre. By 1986 thosecosts had risen to $1,393, $155, and $1,548 respectively, and in 1987 thevariable costs were $1,665, and the fixed costs were $140, for a totalcost of $1,805 per acre. In 1986, assuming an average yield of 225 hundredweightper acre, a producer would have needed to receive $6.88 per hundredweightin order to break even. Record evidence shows that the season average pricefor 1986 was $7.19 per hundredweight. Thus, the producer's profit was only31 cents for each 100-pound sack of potatoes.As is typical for summer crop potatoes, those grown in the proposed productionarea are limited in their storage capability. This is due to the fact thatthe major variety grown (the Norgold Russet) does not store well. In addition,the high temperatures in this area at harvest time cause heat stress whichrenders the potatoes less suitable for long-term storage.The record indicates that when properly grown and handled, High Plainspotatoes are marketable for only a month or two after harvest. For thisreason, most of the crop is shipped immediately after packing, with themost active shipping period being the months of July and August. Witnessestestified that the relatively short life of their potatoes accentuatesmarketing risks by adding an urgency to move High Plains potatoes quicklyinto wholesale and retail channels without regard to existing suppliesand prices in those markets. The High Plains potato crop is primarily marketed in fresh outlets, althougha small portion (about 10 percent in 1985), is used for processing intochips. Competition in the fresh market for High Plains potatoes comes mainlyfrom the summer crops grown in California and Colorado and the early partof the fall crop from Washington. Record evidence in the form of shipmentdata shows that while High Plains potatoes are distributed in most majorU.S. makets, they are most competitive in nearby southern and midwesternmarkets, including markets within the State of Texas. The largest marketfor High Plains potatoes is Dallas, followed, in descending order, by SaintLouis, Chicago, New Orleans, and Denver. Record evidence shows that inrecent years the Texas-New Mexico share of these markets has eroded underthe pressure of shipments from competing producing areas. For example,since 1982, the market share for High Plains potatoes in its principalmarket, Dallas, has trended downward. The High Plains market share in NewOrleans and Denver has also trended downward since 1983. The record indicates that potato markets are somewhat finite and can onlyabsorb a certain volume of supplies before conditions deteriorate. Therefore,one shipping area can increase its share of a market only at the expenseof another area. Such competition is both normal and desirable, inasmuchas it rewards those handlers and areas with the best product and the mostefficient marketing systems. However, when an industry begins to lose itsshare of a market, it indicates a problem which needs to be resolved ifthat industry is to continue its viability. In its essence, loss of marketshare means that a competing area has a product that is in some way moredesirable for purchase. The record indicates that at the same time the High Planes potato industryhas lost market share, prices have declined and are lower than those receivedin other areas. During the ten-year period 1977-86, the total crop value of High Plainspotatoes ranged from $17.3 million in 1979 to $49.6 million in 1984. In1986 the crop value was $32.1 million. During this ten-year period, theseason average price to growers in Texas and New Mexico ranged from a lowof $4.60 per hundredweight, or 47 percent of parity in 1979, to a highof $12.97 per hundredweight, or 130 percent of parity in 1980. Prices receivedfor Texas and New Mexico summer crop potatoes were moderately to substantiallybelow parity in nine of the last ten years. Season aveage prices for potatoesexceeded parity in 1980, but otherwise ranged from 39 to 90 percent ofparity and averaged 71 percent for the period. Prices have trended downwardrelative to parity in the last few years. Testimony indicates that potatoes marketed early in each season often areof poor quality, but they return higher prices than those marketed laterwhen competition occurs with higher quality potatoes from other areas.Due to the shipment of poor quality potatoes at the beginnig of the season,and to increasing supplies, prices for all High Plains potatoes tend todecline as the season progresses until growers at times receive littlefor their potatoes. In 1986, for example, shipping point prices for 50-pound cartons of Norgoldpotatoes grown in the High Plains averaged $17.00 per hundredweight inJuly, and declined to $15.90 in August. Prices received for similar potatoesgrown in Washington were higher, averaging $21.00 in July and $20.34 inAugust. Colorado shippers during those same two months received $17.30and $19.50 per hundredweight, respectively. The record indicates that a large percentage of High Plains potatoes shippedto fresh markets is packed in 50 or 100-pound cartons or bags. These potatoesare prepared for market by the usual commercial practices such as gradingto eliminate inferior quality, sizing to achieve uniformity, and washingto eliminate adhering soil and decay-causing organisms and to improve appearance.High Plains potatoes also move to market in bulk loads which are brokendown into smaller packages by repackers for distribution. Bulk load shipmentsare of two basic types: potatoes that have been sized and graded, and field-runpotatoes. Bulk loads that have been sized and graded account for a substantialpart of the bulk load shipments. They are potatoes which are sorted duringthe normal grading process to remove those that are damaged, have defectssuch as irregular shape or mechanical injury, or are of a very small size.Such potatoes usually have a greater range of sizes and grades than packagedpotatoes.Bulk field-run potatoes are those loaded on trucks essentially as theycome from the field. Some sorting may be done, but the typical field-runlots have a wider range of sizes, grades, and qualities. The record indicatesthat quality of such potatoes is generally below that of commercially gradedand packaged potatoes.At the hearing, representatives of the Texas-New Mexico High Plains potatoindustry identified the lack of consistent quality as a problem area thatmust be improved in both bulk loads and packed potatoes in order to maintainand regain lost market share and to increase returns to growers.Experienced handlers testified that markets often are made and lost onbuyer confidence, which is true with potatoes. Produce buyers place greatvalue upon consistency, particularly with respect to quality. Consumersexpect produce of a good quality at all times and in all seasons. Retailersare often under severe pressure to provide this consistency and tend tobuy only from wholesalers who can supply the desired product. However,at the other end of the chain, the producer is faced with a crop as itnaturally occurs consisting of all possible sizes and qualities.Thus, in the normal course of business, in order to command the best price,it is necessary that the harvested potatoes be washed, sorted, sized andpacked for market. Potatoes that do not meet fresh market requirementsare typically moved to secondary markets such as chips or livestock feed.The standards to which the potatoes are graded and the care with whichthese tasks are performed help to establish an area's reputation for consistentquality. Witnesses testified that individual handlers and shippers in theHigh Plains area do this to varying degrees to enhance their business reputations.However, for an entire production area to earn and maintain such a reputationrequires a concerted effort on the part of the entire industry. Conversely,if a few handlers lower their standards and ship less than acceptable quality,the reputation of the area as a whole suffers.Handlers who ship ungraded, unsized potatoes of questionable quality maycontribute to the generally unfavorable image of High Plains potatoes thatcurrently exists.On the other hand, developing and maintaining industry-wide quality requirementsand shipping potatoes that consistently reflect these requirements canonly enhance the image buyers have of potatoes from the High Plains. Infact, witnesses attributed the higher prices received for comparable potatoesgrown in Washington and Colorado to the quality image earned through yearsof operating mandatory quality control programs similar to this one proposedfor the Texas-New Mexico High Plains. Also, both Colorado and Washingtonprovide promotional support which tends to enhance the image of their potatoes.Without similar tools, the record indicates High Plains shippers competeby offering lower prices, or discounting the product. Discounting is amethod of dealing with competition common to all kinds of businesses. Itis attractive to buyers for the obvious reason that they pay less for theproduct. Record evidence indicates that the seller, however, receives lessfor the product and this reduction is almost always passed on to the grower,the last in line. Thus, a quality control program that enables the productto compete in the market on the basis of quality ultimately yields higherreturns at the grower level.The record indicates that dealers of good quality potatoes in the marketfind it difficult to compete with dealers offering lower grades at discountedprices, and they must buy as cheaply as possible to compete successfully.Price adjustments are frequently requested on higher grade potatoes sothat the receivers can move the potatoes into markets. depressed by lowerprices of inferior grades. Thus, lower grade potatoes in the market depressmarket prices for better grade potatoes.Witnesses testified that the marketing of low quality potatoes is not onlydetrimental to producers and shippers, but these potatoes, especially culls,are not as acceptable to consumers. The testimony indicated that theseconsumer preferences are reflected in reduced retail sales volume and lowerprices that are passed back through distribution channels to shipping point.Because packing, transportation, wholesale handling, and retailer costsare about the same for lower grades or culls as for the the better grades,retail prices for low quality potatoes often are only slightly less thanprices for top quality. However, grower prices for the lower grades oftenare only a small fraction of the price received for better grade potatoes.Witnesses testified that without a mandatory industry-wide quality controlprogram, it has been the practice for some members of the High Plains potatoindustry to offer and sell potatoes of poor or irregular quality at lowprices, thereby having a detrimental effect upon the market and the pricestructure for all production area potatoes. Such disorderly maketing practiceshave been damaging to the industry as a whole. In the aggregate, the successof production area growers in the potato market is to a substantial degreedependent upon the quality of potatoes shipped, and any improvement inthe growers' competitive economic situation requires the adoption of improvedmarket practices. Therefore, the need exists to regulate the marketingof High Plains potatoes through grade, size, quality, pack, container,or marking standards, thereby improving quality which promotes more orderlymarketing conditions and higher returns to producers with due regard tothe interest of consumers.The need also exists for research to improve quality by developing varietiesbetter suited to the growing conditions typical of the proposed productionarea. Research should also include new production methods and materialsas well as ways of improving grower returns by reducing production andmarketing costs. Development of market research and promotion to complementthe quality control program would enable the industry to better competewith other producing areas.The need for a marketing agreement and order program, such as the proposedorder, to eliminate certain price depressing practices with respect topotatoes grown in the production area is established in the record. Theestablishment of more orderly marketing conditions as may be brought aboutby the proposed marketing order and regulations that may be issued underits authority, will tend to improve prices to producers for potatoes grownin the production area.(3) The term ``potatoes'' should be defined to specify the commodity coveredby the proposed order and to which the terms and provisions of the proposedorder are applicable. The term ``potatoes'' has a specific meaning to allproducers of the commodity in the High Plains area, and to other partieswho purchase, ship and distribute the commodity. Such term should be definedto include all varieties of Irish potatoes, classified botanically as Solanumtuberosum, which are currently grown or which may be grown within the productionarea.A definition of the term ``production area'' should be included in theproposed order to fix the area in which potatoes must be grown before thehandling thereof is subject to regulation under the proposed order. Suchterm should be defined to include the following counties in Texas: Bailey,Briscoe, Castro, Cochran, Dallam, Donley, Deaf Smith, Floyd, Gaines, Hale,Hall, Hartley, Hockley, Lamb, Lubbock, Motley, Oldham, Parmer, Swisher,Terry, and Yoakum. This term should also include the following countiesin New Mexico: Chaves, Curry, De Baca, Eddy, Guadalupe, Lea, Roosevelt,Torrance, Union, and Quay.These counties comprise what is known as the High Plains area of each State.They are contiguous and share essentially the same climatic, growing, harvestingand marketing conditions for potatoes. While potatoes are grown in otherareas of Texas and New Mexico, these other areas are distinct, and havedifferent characteristics from the proposed production area such as growingcondition and shipping season. All counties in the proposed productionarea produce potatoes.It is therefore determined that all territory included within the boundariesof the production area constitutes the smallest regional production areathat is practicable, consistent with carrying out the declared policy ofthe Act, and this production area should be defined as hereinafter setforth.(4) The term ``handler'' is synonymous with the term ``shipper'', and shouldbe defined to identify the persons who would be subject to regulation underthe order. Such term should apply to any person except a common carriertransporting potatoes owned by another person, who performs any of theactivities within the scope of the term ``handle'' as hereinafter defined.The definition identifies persons who are responsible for meeting requirementsof the order and the regulations issued thereunder, such as meeting gradeand size requirements, paying assessments, and submitting reports.Common or contract carriers transporting potatoes which are owned by anotherperson should not be considered as handlers, even though they transportpotatoes, because such carriers do not have control over the grade, size,quality or pack of the potatoes being transported. Nor are they the personswho cause the introduction of such potatoes into the stream of commerce.The only interest of common or contract carriers in such potatoes is totransport them for a service charge to destinations determined by others.Growers who handle their own potatoes would be considered handlers. Growerswho sell or otherwise market potatoes directly from the field would behandlers under the proposed order. Any person who purchases potatoes fromgrowers and performs any other handling function such as grading and packingsuch potatoes would be a handler.The term ``handle'' should be defined in the proposed order to establishthe specific marketing functions which place potatoes in the current ofcommerce within the production area, or between the production area andany point outside thereof, and to provide a basis for determining whichfunctions are subject to regulation under authority of the proposed order.``Handle'' and ``ship'' are used synonymously and the definition shouldso indicate.The Act provides that no order shall be applicable to producers in theircapacity as producers. Growing potatoes, which involves the planting andcare of potatoes in the field through growth to a commercially marketableproduct that is turned over to a handler by sale, contract, or other means,should be considered a producer function.Proponents of the order testified that harvesting should be included inthe definition of ``handle''. However, the act of removing the potatoesfrom the ground does not result in them being introduced into the streamof commerce and so does not constitute handling. For this reason ``harvesting''should not be included in the definition of handle.Most of the potatoes grown in the production area are marketed throughestablished packing sheds. Before a producer's crop can be harvested, thevines are killed, either mechanically or by an herbicide, to stop growthand hasten maturity of the tubers. After the vines are sufficiently dried,the potatoes are dug by machine. It is usual for a producer to do somepreliminary grading in the field when the potatoes are being dug. Thispreliminary grading includes the removal of stones, dirt clods, and defectivepotatoes. A conveyor belt on the harvester loads the potatoes onto a truck,and the potatoes are then hauled, in bulk, to a packing shed. At the packingshed, the potatoes are washed and prepared for market by separating theminto marketable grades, sizes, maturity, and packs.For the last few years, a substantial quantity of field-run potatoes havebeen marketed in bulk directly by some producers to receivers, or repackersoutside the area. These field-run potatoes are being transported directlyto market without going through a packing shed and over conventional typegrading equipment, although some grading may take place in the field toprepare them for the market.High Plains producers sell their potatoes in various ways. Most productionarea potatoes are handled by shippers for the grower's account. Under customaryarrangements, producers may turn their fields over to shippers who supervisethe harvesting, then grade, pack, and sell the potatoes and pay the producerthe net proceeds after deducting handling charges. The growers retain titleto the potatoes until they are sold for them by the shippers. Settlementis made with the grower on the net proceeds of the sale, whether the saleis made at shipping point or at a subsequent point in the marketing chain.In other cases, the growers may harvest the potatoes themselves or hireothers to do it.The shipper or packinghouse operator is responsible for preparing the potatoesfor market. The shipper determines the grade, size, quality, and containerto be used for the potatoes entering market channels. The shipper packsthe potatoes, making them a part of the marketable supply which is thesubject of offer, acceptance, and sale in the current of the commerce inthe commodity. The shipper also ships the potatoes, thus transporting themin the current of commerce. Sale of any potatoes, either grades and sizescustomarily acceptable in established terminal markets, or those of lessor unacceptable grates and sizes, constitutes an act on handling.Occasionally, producers sell potatoes in the field to a handler eitherin or outside the production area prior to harvest. The producer may harvestsuch potatoes on behalf of the handler, or harvesting may be done by thehandler. The harvested potatoes may then be transported in bulk to a packinghousefor preparation for marketing. If the potatoes are shipped out of the productionarea the producer would be the first handler, since the producer sold thepotatoes, which is a handling activity, and was responsible for placingthe potatoes in the stream of commerce. The transportation, sale or deliveryof potatoes within the production area, however, for the propose of havingsuch potatoes prepared for market would not constitute handling.Some producers have their own packing facilities; they grow, harvest, grade,pack, sell, and ship their own potatoes. Some perform all of the foregoingfunctions except selling, which is done by a broker for a fee.Seed potatoes are produced under special conditions to insure their positivequalities and freedom from disease and then are certified by an appropriateState agency. The marketing process for seed involves many of the sameactivities, especially sale and transportation, as for potatoes distributedas tablestock through institutional and retail outlets.Each of the foregoing activities by itself is a handling operation and,as such, makes the person responsible for it a handler, subject to therules and regulations issued under the order. However, the sale, transportation,or delivery of field-run potatoes to a packinghouse located in the productionarea, according to record evidence, should be excepted from the definitionof ``handle.'' In this case the potatoes have not yet been prepared formarket nor are they in their existing condition being transported to market.Most sellers and buyers do not consider them as yet suitable or appropriatefor commercial transactions and, as such, they have not yet entered thestream of commerce.(5)(a) Certain terms should be defined for the purpose of designating specificallytheir applicability and limitations whenever they are used in the proposedorder. The definition of terms discussed below is necessary and incidentalto attain the declared policy and objectives of the order and Act.``Secretary'' should be defined to mean the Secretary of Agriculture ofthe United States, or any officer or employee of the United States Departmentof Agriculture who has been or who may be delegated the authority to actfor the Secretary.``Act'' should be defined to provide the correct statutory citation forthe Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, as amended. This is thestatute under which the proposed regulatory program would be operative,and this definition avoids the need to refer to the citation throughoutthe order.``Person'' should be defined to mean an individual, partnership, corporation,association, or any other business unit. This definition is the same asthat contained in the Act and insures that it has the same meaning in theorder as it has in the Act.A definition of ``seed potatoes'' or ``seed'' should be included in theorder because different regulations may be appropriate for such potatoes.Special regulation of seed potatoes is justified because they are producedfor a specialized use, even though they may be used as tablestock. Potatoeslegitimately produced for seed purposes should be identified as ``seedpotatoes'' and defined to include potatoes that have been certified andtagged, or otherwise appropriately identified, by the official seed certifyingagency of the State of Texas or the State of New Mexico, or such otheragency as the Secretary may recognize.The term ``producer'' should be synonymous with ``grower'' and should bedefined to identify those persons who are eligible to vote for, and serveas, producer members and alternates on the committee and those who mayvote in any referendum. The term should mean any person engaged in a proprietarycapacity in the production of potatoes for market within the productionarea.The term ``producer'' should include any person who owns or shares in theownership of potatoes such as a landowner, landlord, tenant or sharecropper.A person who owns and farms land resulting in that person's ownership ofthe potatoes produced on such land should be considered a producer. Thesame is true for a person who rents and farms land resulting in ownershipof all or part of the potatoes produced on that land. Likewise, a personwho owns land which that person does not farm, but as a rental for suchland obtains the ownership of a portion of the potatoes produced, shouldbe regarded as a producer of that portion received as rent, and the tenanton such land should be regarded as a producer for the remaining portionproduced on such land. In each of these situations the person involvedin production, regardless of whether an individual, partnership, jointventure, association, corporation, or other business unit, should be consideredas one producer entitled to one vote in referenda and committee nominations.A joint venture is one whereby several persons contribute resources toa single endeavor to produce and market a potato crop. In such venture,one party may be the farmer who contributes one or more factors, such aslabor, time, production facilities, or cultural skills, and the other partymay be a handler who contributes money and cultural, harvesting and marketingsupervision. Normally, a husband and wife operation would be considereda partnership. One test to determine if a person is a producer should bewhether or not the person, that is, the individual or other business unit,has title to the potatoes that are produced. A number of producers in the High Plains area own or operate packing sheds.A producer who owns or operates a packing shed should not be precludedfrom qualifying as a producer under the proposed order. However, for thepurpose of serving on the committee and participating in committee nominations,a producer-handler must choose whether to serve and vote as a produceror as a handler. The term ``fiscal period'' should be defined to mean the annual periodfor which financial records of the committee are maintained. This periodshould be established so as to allow sufficient time prior to the timepotatoes are first shipped for the committee to organize and develop itsbudget for the ensuing season. However, it should minimize incurring expensesduring a fiscal period prior to the time assessment income is availableto defray such expenses. The Notice of Hearing proposed that ``fiscal period''mean the 12-month period beginning January 1 and ending the following December31. However, record evidence indicates that fresh market shipments of potatoesgrown in the High Plains area do not begin until about July 1. With a fiscalperiod beginning January 1, more than half the period would have elapsedbefore any assessment income was received. Further, such a period wouldrequire the committee to project assessable shipments for the upcomingseason and recommend an appropriate assessment rate prior to the time plantingbegins in February. To eliminate these difficulties, hearing testimonysupported the fiscal period being established for a 12-month period beginningJune 1 and ending May 31 of the next year. However, if necessary to improvethe committee's management or for other reasons, based on experience oncethe order is established, it may be desirable to establish a fiscal periodother than one ending on the last day of May. Thus, authority should beincluded in the order to provide for the establishment of a different fiscalyear if recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary. Inany event, the beginning date of any new fiscal period should be sufficientlyin advance of the harvesting season to permit the committee to formulateits marketing policy and perform other administrative functions. Also,it should be recognized that if at some future date there is a change inthe fiscal year, such change would result in a transition year being moreor less than 12 months. Also, if the order is issued after June 1, 1989,but is made effective in time to regulate the 1989 crop, the initial fiscalyear should end on May 31, 1990, so that the subsequent fiscal period wouldbegin June 1, 1990. The term ``Committee'' should be defined to mean the administrative agencyknown as the Texas-New Mexico Potato Committee established under the provisionsof the proposed order. Such a committee is authorized by the Act, and thisdefinition is merely to avoid the necessity of repeating the full nameeach time it is used. Definitions of ``grade'', ``size'' and ``maturity'' should be includedin the proposed order to enable persons to determine the basis for applicationof grade and size limitations to the potatoes they handle. ``Grade'', ``size''and ``maturity'' should be defined as encompassing the meanings assignedthese terms in the United States Standards for Potatoes issued by the UnitedStates Department of Agriculture and found in Sections 51.1540 to 51.1556,inclusive, of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Also, these definitionsshould include modifications or amendments to such standards, and any variationsfrom such standards that may be used in regulations issued under the proposedorder. In addition to the U.S. Standards, other standards could be usedto define these terms. For example, it is conceivable that New Mexico orTexas could develop standards which would be more appropriate for HighPlains potatoes. Regulations could then use such terms (grade, size andmaturity) with the constant meanings given them in the applicable standards.Also the use of these terms in regulations may be varied by prescribing,for example, a percentage of a grade such as ``85 percent U.S. No. 1.''Federal and Federal-State inspectors are qualified to certify the grade,size and maturity of potatoes grown in the production area under the termsof the aforesaid standards, or as such standards may be amended or modified.``Varieties'' should be defined to mean and include all classificationsor subdivisions of Irish potatoes according to those definitive characteristicsrecognized by the United States Department of Agriculture. The primaryvariety currently produced in the High Plains area is the Norgold Russet.Some red potatoes are also produced, such as the Red Lasoda and Vikingvarieties. The term ``pack'' should be defined to mean a quantity of potatoes in anytype of container, which falls within specific weight limits, numericallimits, grade limits, size limits, or any combination of these recommendedby the Committee and approved by the Secretary. The term ``pack'' is commonlyused throughout the production area and refers to a combination of thesefactors. For example, it is a common practice to refer to the 50-lb. or100-lb. pack. Differences in packs are also recognized by grade, such asU.S. No. 1 pack or U.S. No. 2 pack. Packs may be recognized by particularsizes, such as Size A (minimum diameter of 1\7/8\andmin16;andmin16;) or SizeB (1\1/2\andmin16;andmin16; to 2\1/4\andmin16;andmin16;), or by the number of potatoesin a container, such as size 70 or 70 count per carton. It is essentialthat this term be defined in the proposed order so that appropriate regulationsmay be tailored to particular packs. ``Container'' should be defined to mean a sack, bag, crate, box, basket,barrel or bulk load or any other receptacle used in the packaging, transportation,sale or other handling of potatoes. This definition serves as a basis fordifferentiating among the various receptacles in which potatoes move tomarket, and is necessary in the proposed authority to apply different regulationsto different containers and to limit the types of containers that may beutilized. The principal containers used at present in marketing potatoesare burlap bags, paper bags, mesh bags, paper and mesh bags, polyethylenebags, boxes, pallets, and bulk loads. A definition of the term ``culls'' was included in the Notice of Hearing.This term was used in connection with the section of the proposal establishinga general cull regulation. As discussed later, this Recommended Decisionproposes the deletion of the general cull regulation. Therefore, it isunnecessary to define this term, and it should be deleted from the proposedorder. ``District'' should be defined in the proposed order to provide a basisfor nomination and selection of committee members. It means each of thegeographical divisions of the production area established pursuant to theorder. The districts recommended to be initially established are discussedin material issue (5)(b), as is the proposed authority to reestablish thesedistricts.``Export'' should be defined to mean any destination which is not withinthe 50 states or the District of Columbia of the United States. This definitionis included because the proposed order authorizes exports to be regulateddifferently from domestic shipments.(b) Pursuant to the Act, it is desirable to establish an agency to administerthe order locally as an aid to the Secretary in carrying out the declaredpolicy of the Act and to provide for effective and efficient operationof the order. The Texas-New Mexico Potato Committee should therefore beestablished and consist of 11 members (six producers, four handlers, andone public member). A committee composed of 11 members, with a like numberof alternates, should provide adequate representation and should providefor reasonable judgment and deliberation with respect to recommendationsmade to the Secretary, and in the discharge of other committee duties.Because marketing orders benefit producers, it is appropriate that therebe more producers than handlers on the proposed committee. However, sinceregulations under the proposed order would be imposed upon handlers, itis also appropriate and prudent for handlers to be represented on the committee.The division of the production area into districts for the purpose of committeerepresentation, and the number of members from each district were giventhorough consideration by proponents of the proposed order. As later discussed,it is being recommended that two districts be established. One would encompassthat part of the production area in the State of Texas, and the other thatpart in the State of New Mexico. In determining the number of representativeson the committee from each of the districts, consideration was given topotato acreage shown by the latest figures for each county within the district.Thus, the number of representatives for each district is related to suchdistrict's portion of the total potato acreage in the production area.According to acreage statistics for the past several years, approximately66% of the acreage is located in District 1 (Texas) and 33% in District2 (New Mexico). Accordingly, of the six producer members, four should befrom District 1 and two should be from District 2. Three of the four handlersshould represent District 1, and the remaining handler member should befrom District 2. This should be a practicable and equitable method of allocatingmembership on the committee. Members would be familiar with supply anddemand factors particularly affecting the sale of their potatoes and theeffect of regulation upon such sales.Each member and alternate selected to represent producers in a particulardistrict should be an individual who is a producer, or an officer or employeeof a corporate producer or other type of business unit engaged in producingpotatoes in such district. Producer members should also be residents ofthe production area.Such persons would be expected to have a strong interest in the effectsof committee decisions on potato producers in the proposed production area.As a resident of the production area, such person would be familiar withthe problems and concerns of producers.Each member or alternate selected to represent handlers in a particulardistrict should be an individual who is a handler, or an officer or employeeof a corporate handler or other type of business unit, engaged in handlingsuch district's potatoes. Handler members should also be residents of theproduction area.The Notice of Hearing provided that officers or employees of cooperativemarketing organizations could serve only as handler representatives. Witnessesopposed this provision, however, because a majority of growers in the HighPlains area are members of a marketing cooperative and those that serveas officers of the cooperative should be eligible to serve as grower members.Thus, such persons should not be precluded from serving as grower representatives,and paragraph (b) of andSection; 949.20 should be revised accordingly. Producerswho are members of or hold honorary or non-administrative positions withthe cooperative would also be eligible to serve as grower members. However,employees of the cooperative who are not growers in their own right wouldnot qualify as growers but would be eligible to serve as handler membersonly.Inasmuch as handlers would be the persons regulated under the proposedorder, handler members should have a direct interest in the handling ofpotatoes. Moreover, as residents of the production area, such persons couldbe expected to be familiar with the local problems encountered by the industry.In the event that an individual qualifies to serve as both a grower andhandler member, or as a representative from either district, such personshould choose the classification and district to represent on the committee.Record evidence supports public representation on the administrative committee.While the influence of consumers would be implicitly present in the deliberationsof the producer and handler committee members and all meetings would bepublic, the appointment of a public member would offer many advantages.One would be the direct communication between industry members and thepublic member, who would have no connection with the industry and whoseopinions on regulatory standards would represent the general public. Anotherwould be to afford the industry an opportunity to discuss their problemsand concerns with someone who would view these problems and concerns fromoutside the potato industry.Public representatives should not be permitted to have either a directfinancial interest or be closely associated with the commercial production,processing, financing, buying, packing, or marketing of potatoes exceptas a consumer, nor be a director, officer or employee of any firm so engaged.Such public representatives should be able to devote sufficient time andexpress a willingness to attend committee activities regularly and to familiarizethemselves with the background and economics of the industry. Residencein the production area is not deemed close association with the productionor marketing of potatoes and would not preclude such person from nominationas a public member or alternate. On the contrary, public members shouldbe residents of the production area, since such persons could be expectedto be familiar with and knowledgeable about industry problems and practices.To insure that all portions of the production area are adequately representedin the conduct of the committee's business and that the continuity of operationis not interrupted, the proposed order should provide for alternate memberswith the same qualifications as their respective members. They would actin the place and stead of their respective members during temporary absences,or in the case of death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of themembers. The alternate should serve as member until a new member is selected.Also, the committee should be permitted to request the attendance of alternatesat any or all meetings regardless of whether the members are present. Thiswould be desirable especially when the committee is considering importantmatters and when it is necessary to have a greater expression of industryopinion.If both the member and alternate for a particular committee position areabsent from a meeting, the member, the alternate, or the committee, inthat order, should be empowered to designate another alternate from thesame group (i.e., grower or handler) and district to act in the place ofthe absent member. This procedure would further insure the proper and efficientoperation of the committee.With the exception of initial members, the term of office of committeemembers and their respective alternates should be for three years and shouldbegin as of January 1 and end the last day of December or for such otherthree year period as the committee may recommend and the Secretary approve.A three-year term is appropriate because it gives members sufficient timeto become familiar with committee operations and enables them to make meaningfulcontributions at committee meetings. Furthermore, a three-year term enablesestablishment of a rotation so that approximately one-third of the committeemembership will terminate each year. Staggered terms would lend continuityto the committee by insuring that some experienced members would be onthe committee at all times. Therefore, the order should provide that theterms shall be so determined that approximately one-third of the totalcommittee membership shall terminate each year.The effective date of the proposed order, if issued, may not coincide withthe specified beginning date of the terms of office of committee membersand alternates. Therefore, a provision is necessary to adjust the initialterms of office. To accomplish this, the order should provide that theterm of office of the initial members and alternates shall begin as soonas possible after the effective date of the order. Approximately one-thirdof the initial committee members and alternates should serve for a one-yearterm and approximately one-third of the initial committee members and alternatesshould serve for a two-year term. The remainder of the initial committeemembers and alternates should serve for a three-year term. One method fordetermining how the initial membership should be apportioned would be forthe initial committee member nominees to draw lots to determine which ofthem would be appointed to serve the initial one, two and three year terms.This would also determine the rotation for their successor members. Theorder also should provide that members serving initial terms of one yearor less may serve two additional consecutive three-year terms.In order to prevent unnecessary vacancies from occurring on the committee,the order should provide that members and alternates shall serve in suchcapacity for the portion of the term of office for which they are selected,and until their respective successors are selected. However, so that thereis a continual turnover in membership and infusion of new ideas, the ordershould provide that no member or alternate may serve more than two fullconsecutive terms on the committee unless specifically exempted by theSecretary. After serving two consecutive terms, committee members who haveserved two terms should be eligible to serve as alternates, and alternateswho have served two terms to serve as committee members.As previously discussed, two districts should be established in the proposedorder to provide a geographical basis for the selection of committee membership.District 1 should include all production area counties located within theState of Texas and District 2 should include all production area countieslocated within the State of New Mexico.Redistricting authority is necessary in the proposed order to enable thecommittee and the Secretary to consider from time to time whether the basisfor representation has changed or could be improved and how such improvementmay be made. Future shifts in potato production in the Texas-New MexicoHigh Plains cannot be foreseen at the present time, since shifts may occurin the acreage planted from one year to another. As a result, the numberof members allocated to a district may be disproportionate to the acreageor production in that district. Therefore, it is desirable to provide flexibilityof operations so that if it would be in the best interests of the industryto reestablish districts or reapportion membership, the committee may sorecommend and the Secretary may approve such action. Moreover, record evidenceindicates that the committee should be required to consider district reestablishmentand committee reapportionment at least every five years.The guides and limitations set forth in the proposed order which shouldbe considered in making changes in districts or reapportionment of membersare appropriate and desirable. Recommendations for such changes shouldbe made well in advance of the beginning of a new term of office. Changesshould not be made effective less than 30 days prior to the date on whichterms of office begin, and no recommendations for redistricting or reapportionmentshould be made less than six months prior to such date. These safeguardsare desirable so that producers and handlers may become well acquaintedwith any redistricting or reapportionment of members prior to nominations.The Secretary should have authority for the selection of the members andalternates of the committee, but the industry should have the responsibilityfor recommending nominees to the Secretary for selection. The nominationprocedure outlined in the proposed order would provide a means of makingavailable to the Secretary the names of prospective members and alternatesdesired by the industry to serve on the committee.The order should provide that the Secretary conduct nomination meetingsfor initial committee members. At least one meeting should be held in eachdistrict. All growers and handlers in the production area should receivenotice of such meetings in sufficient time to enable them to attend. Nominationswill be received and voted upon at these meetings. The resulting nominationsfor each of the initial six grower and four handler members and their alternateswill be promptly submitted to the Secretary.The committee should be responsible for conducting subsequent nominations.These nominations may be conducted at meetings or with the approval ofthe Secretary through mail balloting. Nomination meetings may be held inconjunction with meetings of other industry organizations.If meetings are held for nominating members and alternates of subsequentcommittees, they should be held no later than October 1 of each year orsuch other date as the Secretary may specify. Inasmuch as the term of officebegins January 1 of each year, nomination meetings should be held in sufficienttime to assure that nominations for members and alternates will be suppliedthe Secretary so appointments may be made prior to the beginning of eachnew term of office.The committee should also be authorized to conduct nominations by mail.Procedures for such nominations would be recommended by the committee andwould require approval by the Secretary.Nominations should be supplied in such manner and form as the Secretarymay prescribe. At least one nominee should be designated for each positionwhich is to be filled the following January 1. Sufficient information abouteach nominee should be provided so the Secretary is able to determine ifsuch person is qualified for position for which nominated.Only producers should participate in designating nominees for producermembers and alternates, and only handlers should participate in designatinghandler nominees. Such persons should be growers or handlers within thedistrict in which they so participate. If a person produces or handlespotatoes in more than one district, such person should elect the districtwithin which such person wishes to participate in electing nominees forcommittee members and alternates. Likewise, a person who both grows andhandles potatoes should choose whether to participate in nominations forgrower or handler representatives. Each person would thereby have the samevoice in the nomination of committee members.Regardless of the number of districts in which a person produces or handlespotatoes, each person is entitled to cast only one vote. This provisionis deemed necessary as an appropriate safeguard for the protection of allgrowers and handlers participating in nominations, irrespective of thesize of an individual's operations. This limitation, however, is construedto mean that one vote may be cast for each member and alternate memberposition which is to be filled in the district and classification thatperson has chosen to participate.Provisions also should be made for the nomination and selection of a publicmember and alternate. The record indicates that nominees for the publicmember and alternate should be selected by the incumbent committee andshould be forwarded to the Secretary no later than November 1 or such otherdate recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary. The nomineeswould be selected under procedures recommended by the committee and approvedby the Secretary. It is also reasonable to require that the names of nomineesfor the initial public member and alternate be submitted to the Secretaryas soon as possible but not later than 90 days after the first reqularmeeting of the initial producer and handler members of the committee.The order should provide that the members of the committee shall be selectedby the Secretary from persons nominated or from among other qualified persons.In the event nominations are not made within the time and in the mannerhereinafter specified in the recommended order, the Secretary may selectmembers and alternates without regard to nominations. Such selection shouldbe from qualified persons as provided in the order. Each person to be selectedby the Secretary as a member or as an alternate member of the committeeshall, prior to such selection, qualify by advising the Secretary thatsuch person agrees to serve in the position for which nominated.The order should provide a method for promptly filling any vacancies onthe committee for the unexpired term. There may be vacancies caused bythe death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member or alternate.The Secretary should be authorized to name a successor to fill an unexpiredterm from unselected nominees on the current nominee list or from nominationsmade in the same manner as provided for nominating all other members andalternates. Any nomination meetings for the purpose of filling vacanciesshould be held within a reasonable amount of time after the vacancy occurs.Committee members and alternates will necessarily incur some expense whileon committee business. Reasonable expenses, which may include travel, mealsand lodging, should be reimbursed so as to avoid personal financial lossto members while attending committee meetings or performing other dutiesunder the order. Therefore, the order should provide that members and alternates,when serving as members of the committee, shall serve without compensationbut shall be reimbursed for such expenses authorized by the committee andnecessarily incurred by them in attending committee meetings and in theperformance of their duties under the order. Since the committee shouldbe authorized to request the attendance of alternate members at meetings,even though the members may be present, the order should also authorizethe committee to pay their expenses.The order should specify a procedure for the committee to conduct its meetings.It should provide that a majority of all members of the committee shallbe necessary to constitute a quorum or to pass any motion or approve anycommittee action. Accordingly, six members of the eleven member committeemust be present in order to constitute a quorum and enable the committeeto conduct a meeting. Six affirmative votes would be required to pass anymotion or approve any committee action.There may be times when it will be impossible to assemble the committeepromptly to meet an emergency situation. Therefore, the order also shouldenable committee members, and alternate members when acting as members,to vote by mail, telegraph, telephone or other means of communication,provided that any vote cast orally be confirmed promptly in writing. Ifan assembled meeting is held, all votes should be cast in person. Whenvoting is to take place at other than an assembled meeting, a reasonableeffort should be made to contact each member or alternate. Records of suchvotes should indicate the efforts made to contact members, extent and tenorof discussion, and written confirmation of each vote cast. Each motionto be voted on or action to be taken should be explained fully and identicallyto each member or alternate member. The majority quorum and voting requirementsshould still apply when voting by mail, telegraph, telephone or other meansof communication.The committee should be given those specific powers which are set forthin section 608(7)(C) of the Act. Such powers are granted by the enablingstatutory authority and are necessary for an administrative agency, suchas the Texas-New Mexico Potato Committee, to carry out its proper functions.The committee's duties as set forth in the proposed order are necessaryfor the discharge of its responsibilities. These duties are generally similarto those specified for administrative agencies under other programs ofthis nature. They pertain to specific activities authorized under the order,such as investigating potato marketing conditions, and to the general operationof the order including other activities relating to compliance as discussedin material issue (5)(h). They are reasonable and necessary if the committeeis to function in the manner prescribed under the Act and the proposedorder. It should be recognized that the duties specified are not necessarilyall inclusive, and it may develop that there are other duties which thecommittee may need to perform which are incidential to, and not inconsistentwith, these specified duties.(c) The committee should be authorized under the order to incur such expensesas the Secretary finds are reasonable and likely to be incurred, duringeach fiscal year. Such a provision is necessary to assure the maintenanceand functioning of the committee as well as finance production researchand market promotion programs. Necessary expenses would include, but wouldnot be limited to, such items as: Employee salaries and benefits; establishmentof an office and equipping such office; telephone and mail services; andbusiness related transportation for the committee staff. Expenses incurredby committee members and alternates in attending committee meetings shouldalso be reimbursed as another expense. All such expenses would be incurredon an ongoing basis.The committee should be required to prepare a budget showing estimatesof income and expenditures necessary for the administration of the proposedorder during a fiscal year. The budget, including an analysis of its componentparts, should be submitted to the Secretary sufficiently in advance ofeach fiscal period to provide for the Secretary's review and approval.Such timely submission should include a recommendation to the Secretaryof a rate of assessment designed to secure the income required for suchfiscal year.The Act authorizes the Secretary to approve the incurring of expenses bythe administrative agency established under an order and states that theorder must contain provisions requiring handlers to pay their pro ratashare of such expenses.The rate of assessment should be established by the Secretary on the basisof the committee's recommendation and other available information. In theevent that an assessment rate is established which does not generate sufficientincome to pay for the approved expenses, the committee should be authorizedto recommend to the Secretary an increase in the rate of assessment inorder to secure sufficient funds.The Secretary may approve an assessment rate increase, and such increaseshould be applicable to all potatoes handled during the fiscal year towhich that assessment rate applies. The order should provide for the payment of assessments for maintenanceand functioning of the committee throughout the time the order is in effect,irrespective of whether particular provisions of the order are suspendedor are inoperative. Witnesses estimated that the initial assessment rate would likely fallbetween one and three cents per cwt. When applied to 1986 production of4,044,600 cwt., assessment income of $40,446 to $121,338 would be generatedand would be sufficient to cover anticipated program expenses. Witnessesstated they were unable to foresee more precisely what the initial rateor volume of production would be. It was proposed that the committee submit its budget 90 days prior to thebeginning of each fiscal period. With such period proposed to begin June1, the committee would therefore be required to submit its budget by March1. Since planting of the potato crop in the High Plains continues untilearly April, proponents testified that an accurate estimate of productionwould be impossible to make this early in the year. Because crop productionis a vital component used in formulating an assessment rate, a 60 day periodprior to the fiscal period was supported. Section 949.41 should be revisedaccordingly. However, the Secretary should be authorized to specify analternative time period if experience deems it necessary or desirable.The proponents recommended a provision that would allow the establishmentof a continuing assessment rate that would be carried over to the nextfiscal period and remain the same until amended. However, this requestis not consistent with Departmental policy, which is to require annualassessment rate and budget recommendations be submitted by marketing orderadministrative committees. Departmental review and approval prior to eachfiscal period promotes good fiscal practices and responsibility. Therefore,the provision proposed at the hearing to add a paragraph (h) to section949.42 to allow an established assessment rate to continue in effect indefinitelyis not being recommended for inclusion in the proposed order. If a handler does not pay any assessment by the date it is due, the ordershould provide that the late assessment may be subject to a late paymentcharge or an interest charge at a rate set by the committee with the Secretary'sapproval. This interest charge or late payment charge would encourage timelypayments. The time frame in which payments would be required to be remittedshould be recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary. The committee should be authorized to accept advanced payment of assessmentsso that it may pay expenses which become due before assessment income isreceived. This would give the committee more flexibility in paying obligatedexpenses, particularly in the first part of a fiscal year before assessmentfunds are received. The committee should also be able to borrow money to meet administrativeexpenses that would be incurred before assessment income is enough to defraysuch expenses. However, the committee should not borrow money to pay obligationsif sufficient funds already exist in committee reserve funds or in othercommittee accounts. The committee should also be authorized to receive voluntary contributionsfrom persons other than those assessed under the order for the paymentof production research or promotional marketing activities as describedin the order. Such contributions should be received by the committee withoutany obligations to the donor, and the expenditure of such funds shouldbe under the complete control of the committee. The committee should notreceive a voluntary contribution from any person if that contribution couldrepresent a conflict of interest. With the approval of the Secretary, the committee should be authorizedto carry over any excess assessment income into the following fiscal periodas a reserve. If such excess income is not carried over as a reserve, handlersshould be entitled to a refund proportionate to the assessments each handlerpaid. The reserve should not be allowed to exceed approximately two fiscalyears' expenses. One purpose of the reserve fund would be to provide stability in administrationof the order in the case of a low crop year. Also, establishing a reserveshould minimize the necessity of the committee borrowing money or raisingthe assessment rate during a season of less than anticipated production.Finally, reserve funds could be used to cover necessary liquidation expensesin the event the order is terminated. Upon such termination, any fundsnot needed to defray liquidation expenses should be disposed of as determinedby the Secretary. To the extent possible, however, these funds should bereturned pro rata to the handlers from whom they were collected.All funds collected by the committee through assessments or any other provisionof the proposed order should be used only for the purposes set forth inthe proposed order. The Secretary should at all times have authority torequire the committee, its members and alternates, and its employees andagents to account for all receipts, disbursements, property or recordsof the committee for such person has been responsible. Likewise, when anysuch person ceases to act in the aforesaid positions, that person shouldaccount for all receipts, disbursements, property or records of the committeefor which such person has been responsible. In the event the order is terminatedor inoperative, the committee should appoint with the approval of the Secretary,one or more trustees for holding records, funds or other property of thecommittee. (d) The proposed order should authorize the committee to establish andprovide for the establishment of production research, marketing research,and market development projects, not including paid advertising, designedto assist, improve, or promote the marketing, distribution, consumption,or efficient production of potatoes. Funding for these programs shouldcome from any authorized receipts of the committee, including assessmentincome, donations and miscellaneous income such as interest. Testimony indicated that public funds for research are becoming scarcerand more difficult to obtain. Proponents of the marketing order proposalbelieve that the High Plains potato industry needs to finance researchin the areas of breeding and cultural practices, as is conducted in mostother important potato producing areas in the United States. One specific area of research needed is the development of a potato varietybetter able to withstand the heat stress and other climatic conditionsof the High Plains area. Currently, most seed potatoes used for plantingin the production area originate in northern producing areas. These potatoeshave not been developed with the specific needs of the High Plains producerin mind. Other areas of possible production research projects are the reductionof production costs and conservation of resources. The record also supports the need for marketing research and promotionprojects. Research would enable the High Plains potato industry to identifyand analyze its current markets and find ways of regaining lost marketsand developing new ones. Expanding markets for production area potatoes could be accomplished bypromotion activities to acquaint wholesalers, retailers and consumers withthe high quality product available from the High Plains. Record evidenceindicates that the establishment of quality standards for High Plains potatoeswould complement such a promotion program. The committee should distinguish between those types of promotion activitiesallowed under the Act, and paid advertising, which is not authorized forpotatoes. Activities under the proposed order would therefore be limitedto such things as distributing point-of-purchase materials to retailers,providing nutrition information to institutional outlets. The committee should be authorized to conduct these types of activitiesitself, or to contract with other organizations to conduct them on itsbehalf. For example, it was indicated that the committee could contractwith the State universities in Texas and New Mexico to conduct productionand marketing research. Likewise, the committee could contract with theTexas Citrus and Vegetable Association or other organizations to conductits promotion activities. All research and promotion projects to be conducted under the proposedorder in a given fiscal year would be submitted by the committee to theSecretary for approval prior to being undertaken. This will ensure thatall projects are appropriate given the order's authority, and that sufficientfunds will be available for their funding. Further, the committee shouldbe required to report at least annually on the progress of each projectand at the conclusion of each project. Such reports should be availableto growers and handlers and to the Secretary. (e) The declared policy of the Act is to establish and maintain such orderlymarketing conditions for potatoes, among other commodities, as will tendto establish parity prices to growers and be in the public interest. Theregulation of the handling of potatoes by grade, size, maturity, quality,pack, or container, or any combination thereof, as authorized in the proposedorder, would provide a means of carrying out such policy. The procedures and methods outlined in the proposed order for the developmentof marketing policies provide a practical basis for the committee to obtainand compile appropriate and adequate information relating to potato marketingproblems. As a prerequisite to making recommendations with respect to limitationsof shipments in accordance with the proposed order, including any minimumgrade and size regulation in effect on a continuous basis, the committeeshould be required to annually consider and develop a marketing policyfor the handling of potatoes. A marketing policy should set forth the over-all plan for the committeefor orderly marketing of potatoes during the ensuing season, including,to the extent practical, the kinds of regulations that may be desirable.The committee should be required to publicly announce the submission ofits marketing policy, and copies should be made available to producersand handlers in the production area in order to give them ample time tofamiliarize themselves with proposed regulations and plan their individualoperations accordingly. Marketing policies should be submitted to the Secretaryfor review and for use in evaluating the committee's recommendations forregulations.The factors set forth in the proposed order which the committee shouldconsider in developing its marketing policy are necessary for a properevaluation of the market outlook. The committee should have available allof the latest supply and price information for its area and competing areas.It should know, from information available and from the informed membersthemselves, the condition and quality of the crop in its area as well asin competing areas. The committee members themselves will be informed concerningproblems peculiar to the area, such as prospective quality and maturityof the crop, and will be able to consider these factors in determiningits marketing policy.If the marketing policy should need to be amended or modified during aseason, the committee should be authorized to do so and the Secretary shouldreceive a report regarding the revised policy. The committee should givethe same publicity to each revised policy report as is given to the initialreport to notify producers and handlers of the changes.The Texas-New Mexico Potato Committee, as the local administrative agencyunder the proposed order, should be authorized to recommend such grade,size, maturity, quality, pack and container regulations as are authorizedby the proposed order, and as will tend to effectuate the declared policyof the Act. It is essential to the successful operation of the proposedmarketing program that the committee should have such responsibility. Thecommittee should reflect the thinking of the industry, and the committeeshould present to the Department its views and recommendations for promotingmore orderly marketing conditions so as to improve growers' returns forproduction area potatoes. The committee should, therefore, have authorityto recommend such regulations as are authorized whenever such regulationswould, in the judgment of the committee, tend to improve returns to producers.With each recommendation for regulation, the committee should be requiredto submit to the Secretary the data and information on which its recommendationis predicated and such other information as may be requested by the Secretary.Witnesses at the hearing supported including a general cull regulationin the proposed order (andSection; 949.52) to establish minimum quality andsize standards. As established in that section this cull regulation wouldrequire that potatoes shipped to the fresh market meet a minimum gradeof U.S. No. 2 and a minimum size of 1\1/2\ inches in diameter. The recordindicates that these would be appropriate standards to impose initiallyto keep potatoes of undesirable quality and size off the market. The generalcull regulation would apply on a continuous basis, unless suspended ormodified, and as proposed in the notice of hearing, there would be no requirementthat the committee review it in its annual marketing policy considerations.While witnesses supported the cull regulation, they also supported includingauthority for that regulation to be modified or suspended upon recommendationof the committee and approval of the Secretary. Such recommendation wouldbe based upon the committee's assessment of current and prospective growingand marketing conditions. For example, it was indicated that there maybe seasons of adverse growing conditions that would result in a reductionof general quality and a higher portion of the crop that would not meetthe requirements of the cull regulation. In such a situation, suspensionof the regulation would appear appropriate.Likewise, recommendations for modification of the cull regulation wouldalso be based upon an appraisal of supply and demand conditions. Modificationscould be recommended to either loosen or tighten the U.S. No. 2, 1\1/2\inch requirements. For example, changes in consumer demand could necessitateallowing smaller sized potatoes of one or more varieties to be shippedto fresh market. On the other hand, it may be desirable to strengthen theminimum standards. For example, the standards for a U.S. No. 2 grade potatodo not include a maturity requirement, which the industry may concludeis necessary.The types of considerations that would lead to a modification or suspensionof the proposed cull regulation are essentially the same as those requiredto be given in the committee's marketing policy.Additionally, paragraph (a)(4) of andSection; 949.53 of the proposed orderwould provide authority to establish in terms of grades, sizes, or both,minimum standards of quality and maturity recommended by the committeeand established by the Secretary.The record indicates that one reason the inclusion of a cull regulationin the proposed order was supported was that it would authorize continuanceof grade and size requirements in the event season average prices wereexpected to exceed parity. The Act specifically prohibits any regulatoryaction that has as its purpose the maintenance of prices above the paritylevel. However, it provides that the Secretary may continue regulationsfor the remainder of a marketing season in an above parity situation ifthe Secretary finds that such regulations are necessary to provide fororderly marketing and are in the public interest. In the event of an over-paritysituation, the Secretary would need to review current and prospective conditionsto make the required findings to continue regulations. The inclusion ofthe proposed cull regulation would not, therefore, guarantee the maintenanceof the U.S. No. 2, 1\1/2\ inch minimum regulatory requirements, as proposedat the hearing. For this reason, as well as those previously discussed,the cull regulation and all references to it should be deleted from theproposed order as being redundant, unnecessary and inconsistent with otherprovisions of the proposed order. However, to carry out the intent of theproponents, paragraph (a)(4) of andSection; 949.53 should be revised to authorizeminimum standards of quality and maturity when season average prices areexpected to exceed the parity level.Section 949.53 of the proposed order should authorize the Secretary, onthe basis of committee recommendations or other available information,to issue various grade, size, quality, maturity, pack, and container regulationswhich are necessary for the improvement of marketing conditions for productionarea potatoes.Such regulations could: (1) Regulate the handling of particular grades, sizes, qualities, maturities,or packs of any or all varieties of potatoes, or any combination of theforegoing during any period; (2) Regulate the handling of particular grades, sizes, qualities, maturitiesor packs of potatoes differently, for different varieties, for differentcontainers, for different packs, for different purposes under andSection;949.55 or for any combination of the foregoing, during any period; (3) Fix the size, capacity, weight, dimensions, pack or labeling of thecontainer or containers which may be used in the packaging or handlingof potatoes, or both. The grade, size, quality, maturity, and pack of potatoes which are shippedto market at any particular time have a direct effect on returns to producers.Record evidence shows that the marketing of low quality potatoes harmsthe reputation of production area potatoes, thus decreasing the demandfor them. The result is lower returns to all producers, even for the bettergrades and sizes. By having authority to regulate shipments of potatoes by grade, size, quality,maturity and pack during any period, the shipment of low quality and undesirablesizes of potatoes could be restricted to the extent deemed necessary bythe committee and in accordance with the particular preferences of buyersfor grades, sizes, or packs during any period. This should enhance thereputation of Texas-New Mexico High Plains potatoes and result in higherreturns for production area potatoes. The proposed order should also authorize the Secretary to fix, throughrules and regulations, the size, weight, capacity, dimensions, pack ormarking of the containers that may be used in handling potatoes. Such rulescould promote orderly marketing by standardization of packs and eliminationof improper or misleading packaging techniques. The proposed order should, however, specifically provide that nothing inthe order shall authorize any regulation eliminating shipments of potatoesin bulk. As previously discussed, bulk shipments of potatoes to repackersoutside the production area are important in the marketing of High Plainspotatoes. While this type of movement should not be prohibited, bulkloadshipments should be required to meet the same size and quality standardsas are imposed upon other shipments. This provision, contained in paragraph(d) of andSection; 949.54 of the notice of hearing, has been redesignatedas paragraph (c) of andSection; 949.53 to clarify that it applies to theissuance of all regulations. At this point it is impossible to predict what kind of regulations wouldbe recommended by the committee to the Secretary. However, a minimum gradeof U.S. No. 2 and a minimum size of 1\1/2\ inches in diameter would belikely, given the cull regulation supported at the hearing. At the outset,the regulatory recommendations may be minimal, but standards could increasesover subsequent marketing seasons as the committee gains experience andhas the opportunity to study the marketing situation and reevaluate thetypes of regulations needed to solve the production area's potato marketingproblems. The committee should have the broad spectrum of authority inthe proposed order available to enable it to deal effectively with thoseproblems. The Secretary should not be precluded from using any available informationwhich may or may not have been provided by the committee for considerationin issuing such regulations. Also, when the Secretary determines that anyregulation no longer tends to effectuate the declared policy of the Act,the proposed order should provide authority to amend or terminate thatregulation. The proposed order should provide for prompt notification of the committeeby the Secretary whenever action is taken with respect to regulations,and the committee should promptly notify all handlers of such actions.This requirement is appropriate and necessary for the proper and efficientadministration of the program. This provision contained in paragraph (d)of andSection; 949.54 has been redesignated as paragraph (b) of andSection;949.53 to clarify that it applies to the issuance of all regulations. The proposed order should provide for the amendment, modification, suspensionor termination of regulations by the Secretary whenever such action iswarranted upon recommendation of the committee or other available information.The need for this authority is obvious in that flexibility is requiredto adjust regulations to effectuate the declared policies of the Act. The proposed order is intended to improve marketing conditions with respectto commercial shipments, mainly carlots or truck lots, of potatoes goinginto fresh markets. However, some smaller shipments are occasionally madewhich constitute a very minor percentage of the total movement and aremuch smaller in volume than what is normally considered a commercial shipment.Regulation of such small volumes may not be necessary or cost effective.Therefore, authority should be contained in the proposed order to relievesuch shipments from regulations, assessments, or inspection when such isin the best interest of the program. The Secretary should be authorized upon the basis of the recommendationsand information submitted by the committee to modify, suspend or terminateregulations with respect to the handling of potatoes for purposes otherthan for disposition in normal trade channels. Potatoes moving to or servingsuch outlets are usually handled in a different manner, or such outletsusually accept different grades, sizes, qualities, packs, and containers,or different prices are returned, or combinations of such considerationsmay apply. Such shipments usually do not have any appreciable effect onthe marketing of the great bulk of potatoes handled in commercial markets.The proposed order should provide authority for the committee to give appropriateconsideration to the handling of potatoes for such purposes so that everyopportunity may be taken to facilitate such handling and improve marketingconditions for potatoes thereby tending to increase total returns to potatogrowers in the production area. Such outlets would include relief, charity, livestock feed, export, seed,and other purposes which may become apparent in the future and which wouldbe specified by the committee and approved by the Secretary. Shipmentsintended for relief or charity are usually by the way of donation, andthe committee should have authority to recommend waiving of the requirementsin regard to these shipments since they do not interfere with regular commercialmovement. The same is true for potatoes utilized as livestock feed. Mostof these are low quality potatoes, and should not be disposed of in freshmarket outlets. Some export markets may accept or prefer certain gradesor sizes which normally are discounted for domestic markets. The proposedorder should provide for appropriate modification, suspension or terminationof regulations with respect to movement of potatoes to export outlets sothat these demands can be met and the sale of the potatoes grown in theproduction area will continue to such markets. Seed potatoes are produced under special conditions to insure their positivequalities and freedom from disease. If properly qualified, these potatoesare certified by an appropriate State agency. Because of the difficultyin assuring that uncertified seed potatoes would be used for that purpose,the exemption authority in andSection; 949.55 should apply only to such potatoessold to a producer exclusively for planting within specific geographiclimits. The authority for modifying, suspending or terminating grade, size, quality,assessment, or inspection regulations should be accompanied by additionaladministrative authority for the committee to recommend, and the Secretaryto prescribe, adequate safeguards to prevent shipments for such purposesfrom entering market channels contrary to provisions of such special regulations.Authority for the establishment of safeguards should include such limitationsor appropriate qualifications on shipments which are necessary and incidentalfor proper and efficient administration of the proposed order.(f) The record evidence is that inspection and certification of potatoshipments are necessary and are the most practicable way to assure thatthe handling of potatoes complies with the regulations that may be issuedpursuant to the proposed order. The Federal-State Inspection Service hasinspectors in the production area and has operated in the High Plains areafor many years. Potato producers and handlers throughout the productionarea are well acquainted with the Service and with the inspection theyoffer on shipments of potatoes. Inspection is available at potato packingsheds throughout the entire production area, and would be available forbulk shippers, either at central locations or at the bulk shipper's premises.Inspection and certification requirements are necessary so that growers,shippers, the committee and other interested persons may determine if shipmentscomply with the regulations in effect. Effective regulation of the handlingof potatoes grown in the production area requires evidence that each shipmentis in compliance with regulations issued under the order. The provisionfor inspection and certification affords a practical means of establishingwhether shipments comply and can be so identified. Compliance and identificationof regulated potatoes are necessary for proper administration of the proposedorder. Responsibility for obtaining inspection would generally fall primarilyupon the person who first handles regulated potatoes since that handleris usually responsible for the grade, size, quality, and pack of the potatoesbeing shipped. It was testified that inspected potatoes subject to regulation may be regraded,resorted, or repacked, and that it may not always be possible to identifysuch potatoes with the applicable inspection certificate. Those lots couldtake on a whole new identity, and could not be identified with a previousinspection certificate obtained by a previous handler. Any handling ofthese lots should be in compliance with the requirements of the order.Otherwise, effective regulation would not be obtained, as there would beno assurance that order requirements were not circumvented. Therefore,the committee, with approval of the Secretary, should be authorized toissue rules requiring inspection on regraded, resorted or repacked lots,or providing for special inspection requirements or relief therefrom tocover situations when positive lot identity has not been maintained. To facilitate monitoring compliance, the committee may find it necessaryto require that potatoes which have been inspected and certified be identifiedby some means to indicate that such potatoes were inspected. Therefore,upon recommendation of the committee and approval by the Secretary, anyor all potatoes inspected and certified should be identified by appropriateseals, stamps or tags to be affixed to the container by the handler underthe direction and supervision of a Federal or Federal-State Inspector orthe Committee. Master containers should be required to be so identified,and not each individual container within a master container. Since thepurpose of this authority is to help the committee exercise surveillanceover the shipment of potatoes from the production area and ascertain compliancewith the inspection and certification requirements of the order, it isnot necessary that individual containers within a master container be soidentified. This should reduce the cost of identifying those shipments.Although some potatoes can be stored for long periods of time, they areperishable in nature. Even those that are stored under optimum conditionsundergo some changes, including deterioration and sprouting. Therefore,an inspection certificate may not reflect the true quality of a lot ofpotatoes which has been held for some time after it was inspected. Becauseof the necessity of valid representation by inspection certificates, thecommittee should be authorized to establish, with the approval of the Secretary,a length of time for which an inspection certificate is valid. Promptly after inspection and certification, each handler would submit,or cause to be submitted, to the committee a copy of the certificate ofinspection issued with respect to such potatoes. The certificate wouldverify that the potatoes meet the order requirements. Although the testimonyis that the Inspection Service should be required to submit the certificatesto the committee, it should be the handler's responsibility to do so. However,the handler may arrange with the Inspection Service for it to send in thecertificates on behalf of the handler. The committee should be authorized to recommend for the Secretary's issuance,regulations requiring that potatoes transported by motor vehicle or anyother means be accompanied by a copy of the inspection certificate issuedthereon or by other approved evidence of inspection. Such certificate ordocument shall be surrendered to such authority as may be designated. Thecommittee is authorized under the proposed order to administer its termsand provisions and this procedure would enable the committee to apply theregulations in connection with the movement of potatoes through any compliancecheck points which may be set up along the boundaries of the productionarea. (g) The committee should have authority, with the approval of the Secretary,to require that handlers submit to it such reports and information as areneeded to perform its functions. It is difficult to anticipate every typeof report, or kind of information, which the committee may need in administeringthe program, but it should have the authority, subject to the approvalof the Secretary, to request reports and information if needed, of thetype set forth in the proposed order. At the hearing, witness testimonymodified the information collection list to include information on thenumber of acres by variety and approximate dates planted. Such informationwould provide the committee with the data necessary to help formulate itsmarketing policy and recommend a budget and assessment rate by enablingmore accurate production forecasts. The record evidence is that in the normal course of business, handlershave the necessary information in their possession and based on the experienceof similar orders now in effect, the requirement that they furnish it tothe committee in the form of reports should not constitute an undue burden.Reports are needed by the committee for such purposes as: Collecting assessments;collecting statistical data for use in marketing policy development andrecommendations for regulations; and determining whether handlers are complyingwith order requirements.Reports furnished to the committee should be submitted in such manner andat such times as the committee, with approval of the Secretary, may designate.Such reporting procedures should be in accord with the needs and requirementsof the committee which are essential to administration of the order becausechanging conditions may warrant changes in the forms and methods of reporting.Since it is possible that a question may arise with respect to compliancewith the proposed order, each handler should maintain complete recordsof the handling and disposition of potatoes for a period of not less thantwo years after the end of each crop year.In order to determine handlers' compliance with the proposed order andregulations issued thereunder, the committee with approval of the Secretaryshould be authorized to prescribe through rules and regulations, the kindsof records and documents which shall be maintained by each handler withrespect to each sale of potatoes. Such authorization should include authorityfor requiring proof or evidence of sale for each lot of potatoes sold,including the date of sale, the name of the buyer, the quantity, price,grade and size, the buyer's confirmation and record of payment, and otherpertinent information which may be required by the committee. This informationshould be available for inspection by an authorized agent of the committeeor the Secretary.All reports and records submitted for committee use by handlers shall remainconfidential and be disclosed to none other than persons authorized bythe Secretary except as required by law. Such reports would become partof the committee's and the Secretary's records. Any reported informationreleased to the industry should be on a composite basis, and no informationshould be released under the Act that would disclose either the identityof an individual handler or that person's operations.(h) No handler should be permitted to handle potatoes, the handling ofwhich is prohibited by the proposed order or by regulations issued underthe proposed order. If the program is to be effective, compliance withits requirements is essential, and no handler should be permitted to evadeany of its provisions. Any such evasion on the part of even one handler,could be demoralizing to those handlers who are in compliance and wouldtend to impair the effective operation of the program.The Notice of Hearing included a second paragraph in andSection; 949.81 whichpertained to the committee's authority to inspect handler records for compliancepurposes. However, this authority is provided in the provision of the proposedorder regarding reports and recordkeeping (andSection; 949.80), and thereforeit should be deleted from andSection; 949.81 as redundant and unnecessary.(i) The provisions of andSection;andSection; 949.82 through 949.92 of the orderas contained in the Notice of Hearing and hereinafter set forth in therecommended order, are common to marketing agreements and orders now operating.All such provisions are incidental to and not inconsistent with the Actand are necessary to effectuate the other provisions of the recommendedmarketing order and marketing agreement and to effectuate the declaredpolicy of the Act. The record evidence supports inclusion of each suchprovision as proposed in the Notice of Hearing, with the exception of andSection;949.84 as discussed below. Those provisions which are applicable to boththe marketing agreement and the marketing order, identified by sectionnumber and heading are as follows: andSection; 949.82 Right of the Secretary;andSection; 949.84 Termination or suspension; andSection; 949.85 Proceedingsafter termination: andSection; 949.86 Effect of termination or amendment;andSection; 949.87 Duration of immunities; andSection; 949.88 Agents; andSection;949.89 Derogation; andSection; 949.90 Personal liability; andSection; 949.91Separability; and andSection; 949.92 Amendments. Those provisions applicableto the marketing agreement only are: andSection; 949.97 Counterparts; andSection;949.98 Additional Parties; and andSection; 949.99 Order with marketing agreement.The order should provide that the Secretary conduct a periodic referendumevery six years with the initial referendum conducted within six yearsof the effective date of the recommended order.The Secretary of Agriculture has determined that continuance referendaare an effective means for ascertaining whether producers favor continuanceof marketing order programs. The Act provides that the Secretary shallterminate a marketing order whenever, through the conduct of a referendum,it is indicated that a majority of all producers favor termination andsuch majority produced more than 50 percent of the commodity for marketduring a representative period.Since less than 50 percent of all producers usually participate in a referendum,it is difficult to determine overall producer support or opposition totermination of an order. Thus, to provide a basis for determining whetherproducers favor continuance of the order, authority for continuance referendashould be included. Continuance should be based upon the affirmative voteof two-thirds of the producers voting or producers of two-thirds of thevolume of potatoes represented in the referendum.Hearing testimony favored the concept of conducting continuance referenda,but opposed a two-thirds vote requirement to continue the marketing order.It was stated that one-third of the industry should not determine the fateof the program, and that a majority vote would be more equitable.The Act requires that in the promulgation or amendment of a marketing order,at least two-thirds of the producers voting, by number or volume representedin the referendum, must favor the issuance or amendment of a marketingorder. Continuance referenda requirements are based on the same standardof industry support. The Secretary would consider termination of the orderif less than two-thirds of the producers voting in the referendum or producersof less than two-thirds of the volume of potatoes represented in the referendumfavor continuance. In evaluating the merits of continuance versus termination,the Secretary should not only consider the results of the referendum butalso should consider all other relevant information concerning the operationof the order and the relative benefits and disadvantages to producers,handlers and consumers in order to determine whether continued operationof the order would tend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act. Inthis regard, in the event of an adverse vote by producers in a continuancereferendum, the Secretary may solicit input from the public through meetings,press releases, or other means.In any event, section 8c(16)(B) of the Act requires the Secretary to terminatethe order whenever the Secretary finds that the majority of all producersfavor termination, and that such majority produced more than 50 percentof the commodity for market. To be effective, termination of the orderresulting from any referendum should be announced on or before the lastdate of the then current fiscal year. This date precedes the beginningof the committee's operations for a new fiscal year and is considered tobe an appropriate time to terminate the operations of the program. The Secretary's ``Guidelines for Fruit, Vegetable, and Specialty Crop MarketingOrders'' provide for periodic referenda to allow producers the opportunityto indicate their support for or rejection of a marketing order. It isthe position of the Department that periodic referenda ensure that marketingorder programs continue to be accountable to producers, obligate producersto evaluate their programs periodically, and involve them more closelyin their operation. The record evidence supports these goals.<ITAG tagnum="84">Rulings on Briefs of Interested Parties</ITAG>At the conclusion of the hearing the Administrative Law Judge fixed June1, 1988, as the final date for interested persons to file proposed findingsand conclusions, and written arguments or briefs based upon the evidencereceived at the hearing. No briefs were filed.<ITAG tagnum="84">General Findings </ITAG>Upon the basis of the evidence introduced at the hearing, and the recordthereof, it is found that: (1) The marketing agreement and order, and all of the terms and conditionsthereof, will tend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act; (2) The said marketing agreement and order regulate the handling of potatoesgrown in the production area in the same manner as, and are applicableonly to persons in the respective classes of commercial or industrial activityspecified in, a proposed marketing agreement and order upon which a hearinghas been held; (3) The said marketing agreement and order are limited in their applicabilityto the smallest regional production area which is practicable, consistentwith carrying out the declared policy of the Act, and the issuance of severalorders applicable to subdivisions of the production area would not effectivelycarry out the declared policy of the Act; (4) There are not differences in the production and marketing of potatoesgrown in the production area which make necessary different terms and provisionsapplicable to different parts of such area; and (5) All handling of potatoes grown in the production area, as defined insaid marketing agreement and order, is in the current of interstate orforeign commerce or directly burdens, obstructs, or affects such commerce.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 7 CFR Part 949 </ITAG>Marketing agreements and orders, potatoes, Texas, New Mexico.<ITAG tagnum="84">Recommended Marketing Agreement and Order </ITAG>The following marketing agreement and order are recommended as the detailedmeans by which the foregoing conclusions may be carried out. Those sectionsidentified with an asterick (*) apply only to the proposed marketing agreementand not to the proposed marketing order. Therefore, Title 7, Chapter IX is proposed to be amended by adding Part949 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 949_IRISH POTATOES GROWN IN THE HIGH PLAINS AREA OF TEXAS ANDNEW MEXICO</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.1 Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.2 Act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.3 Person.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.4 Production area.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.5 Potatoes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.6 Seed potatoes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.7 Handler.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.8 Handle or ship.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.9 Producer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.10 Fiscal period.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.11 Committee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.12 Grade, size and maturity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.13 Varieties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.14 Pack.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.15 Container.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.17 District.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.18 Export.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Committee</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.20 Establishment and membership.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.21 Alternates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.22 Term of office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.23 Districts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.24 Redistricting and reapportionment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.25 Nominations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.26 Selection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.27 Failure to nominate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.28 Acceptance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.29 Vacancies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.30 Expenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.31 Procedure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.32 Powers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.33 Duties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Expenses and Assessments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.40 Expenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.41 Budget.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.42 Assessments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.43 Accounting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Research and Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.48 Research and development.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Regulation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.50 Marketing policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.51 Recommendations for regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.53 Issuance of regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.54 Modification, suspension or termination of regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.55 Handling for special purposes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Inspection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.60 Inspection and certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Reports and Recordkeeping</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.80 Reports and recordkeeping.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Compliance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.81 Compliance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Miscellaneous Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.82 Right of the Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.84 Termination or suspension.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.85 Proceedings after termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.86 Effect of termination or amendment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.87 Duration of immunities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.88 Agents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.89 Derogation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.90 Personal liability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.91 Separability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.92 Amendments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Marketing Agreement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.97 Counterparts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.98 Additional parties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">949.99 Order with marketing agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 1-19, 48 Stat. 31, as amended; 7 U.S.C. 601 etseq.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Secretary. </ITAG>``Secretary'' means the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States,or any officer or employee of the Department of Agriculture who has beendelegated, or who may hereafter be delegated the authority to act for theSecretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Act. </ITAG>``Act'' means Public Act No. 10, 73d Congress, as amended and as reenactedand amended by the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, as amended[Sec. 1-19, 48 Stat. 31, as amended; 7 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq</T3>.].<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Person. </ITAG>``Person'' means an individual, partnership, corporation, association,or any other business unit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Production area. </ITAG>``Production area'' means the counties of: Bailey, Briscoe, Castro, Cochran,Dallam, Donley, Deaf Smith, Floyd, Gaines, Hale, Hall, Hartley, Hockley,Lamb, Lubbock, Motley, Oldham, Parmer, Swisher, Terry, and Yoakum locatedin the State of Texas, and the counties of Chaves, Curry, De Baca, Eddy,Guadalupe, Lea, Roosevelt, Torrance, Union, and Quay located in the Stateof New Mexico.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Potatoes. </ITAG>``Potatoes'' means and includes all varieties of <T3>Solanum tuberosum,</T3> commonly known as Irish potatoes, grown inthe production area.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Seed potatoes. </ITAG>``Seed potatoes'' or ``seed'' means any potatoes have been certified bythe official seed certification agency of the States of Texas or New Mexico,or other seed certification agencies recognized by the Secretary, and whichbear the official tags, seals, or other appropriate identification indicatingsuch certification.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handler. </ITAG>``Handler'' is synonymous with ``shipper'' and means any person, excepta common or contract carrier of potatoes owned by another person, who handlespotatoes or causes potatoes to be handled.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.8 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handle or ship. </ITAG>``Handle'' or ``ship'' means to grade, package, sell, transport, or inany other way to place potatoes grown in the production area, or cuasesuch potatoes to be placed, in the current of commerce within the productionarea or between the production area and any point outside thereof. Suchterm shall not include the transportation, sale, or delivery within theproduction area of field-run potatoes to storage or to a person for thepurpose of having such potatoes prepared for market.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Producer. </ITAG>``Producer'' is synonymous with ``grower'' and means any person engagedin a proprietary capacity in the production of potatoes for market.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fiscal period. </ITAG>``Fiscal period'' means the 12-month period beginning on June 1 and endingMay 31 of the following year, or such other period that may be recommendedby the committee and approved by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Committee. </ITAG>``Committee'' means the administrative committee known as Texas-New MexicoPotato Committee established pursuant to andSection; 949.20.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Grade, size and maturity. </ITAG>``Grade'' means any of the officially established grades of potatoes, ``Size''means any of the officially established sizes of potatoes, and ``Maturity''means any of the stages of development or condition of the outer skin (epidermis)of potatoes, as defined in the United States Standards for Potatoes issuedby the United States Department of Agriculture [andSection;andSection; 51.1540to 51.1556, inclusive of this title], including amendments, modifications,or variations thereof, or, such other grades, sizes, and maturities asmay be recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Varieties. </ITAG>``Varieties'' means all classifications or subdivisions of Irish potatoesaccording to those definitive characteristics now or hereafter recognizedby the United States Department of Agriculture.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.14 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pack. </ITAG>``Pack'' means a quantity of potatoes in any type of container, which fallswithin specified weight limits, numerical limits, grade limits, size limits,or any combination of these recommended by the committee and approved bythe Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Container. </ITAG>``Container'' means a sack, bag, crate, box, basket, barrel, or bulk loador any other receptacle used in the packaging, transportation, sale orother handling of potatoes. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.17 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">District. </ITAG>``District'' means each of the geographic divisions of the production areainitially established pursuant to andSection; 949.23 or as reestablishedpursuant to andSection; 949.24. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.18 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Export. </ITAG>``Export'' means the shipment of potatoes to any destination which is notwithin the 50 States, or the District of Columbia, of the United States.<ITAG tagnum="84">Committee</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment and membership.</ITAG>(a) There is hereby established a committee, consisting of 11 members,to administer the terms and provision of this part. Six members shall beproducers, 4 members shall be handlers, and 1 shall be a public member.Each committee member shall have an alternate who shall have the same qualificationsas the member.(b) Each member, other than the public member, shall be an individual whois, prior to selection and during such term of office (1) a resident ofthe production area, and (2) a producer or handler, or an officer or employeeof a producer or handler.(c) Four members shall be producers from District 1 and 2 members shallbe producers from District 2. Three members shall be handlers from District1 and 1 member shall be a handler from District 2. Any person who operatesin more than one district or is engaged in both producing and handlingpotatoes shall elect one classification, and one district from which tobe represented on the committee.(d) The public member shall be a resident of the production area and beneither a producer nor a handler and shall have no direct financial interestin the commercial production, financing, buying, packing and marketingof potatoes, except as a consumer, nor shall such person be a director,officer or employee of any firm so engaged.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.21 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Alternates.</ITAG>An alternate member of the committee shall act in the place and stead ofthe member for whom such person is an alternate, during such member's absenceor when designated to do so by such member. In the event both a memberof the committee and that member's alternate are unable to attend a committeemeeting, the member, the alternate, or the committee, in that order, maydesignate another alternate from the same district and the same classification(handler or producer) to serve in such member's stead. In the event ofthe death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, thatmember's respective altenate shall serve until a successor of such memberis selected and has qualified. The Committee may request the attendanceof alternates at any or all meetings, notwithstanding and expected or actualpresence of the respective members. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.22 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Term of office.</ITAG>(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this section, theterm of office of committee members and their respective alternates shallbe for three years and shall begin as of January 1 and end the last dayof December or for such other three-year period as the committee may recommendand the Secretary approve. Members and alternates shall serve in such capacityfor the portion of the term of office for which they are selected, anduntil their respective successors are selected. No member or alternatemay serve more than two consecutive terms on the committee unless specificallyexempted from this requirement by the Secretary.(b) The term of office of the initial members and alternates shall beginas soon as possible after the effective date of this subpart. As determinedby the Secretary, approximately one-third of the initial committee membersand alternates shall serve for a one-year term and approximately one-thirdof the initial committee members and alternates shall serve for a two-yearterm. The remainder of the initial committee members and alternates shallserve for a three-year term. Those member serving initial terms of oneyear or less may serve two additional, consecutive three-year terms.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.23 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Districts.</ITAG>To determine a basis for selecting committee members, the following districtsof the production area are hereby initially established:<T3>District 1: </T3>All production area counties located within the Stateof Texas and;<T3>District 2: </T3>All production area counties located within the Stateof New Mexico. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Redistricting and reapportionment.</ITAG>At least every five years the committee shall review the geographic distributionof potato production in the production area and, if warranted, recommendto the Secretary the reapportionment of members among districts, and thereestablishment of districts within the production area. In recommendingany such changes, the Committee shall give consideration to:(a) Shifts in potato acreage within the districts and within the productionarea during recent years;(b) The importance of new production in its relation to existing districts;(c) The equitable relationship of committee membership and districts; and(d) Other relevant factors. No change in districting or in apportionmentof members within districts may become effective less than 30 days priorto the date on which terms of office begin each year and no recommendationsfor such redistricting or reapportionment may be made less than 6 monthsprior to such date.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nominations.</ITAG>(a) Initial members. The nomination process for the initial committee shallbe conducted by the Secretary. The nominations for each of the 6 initialproducer and 4 initial handler members of the committee, together withthe nominations for the initial alternate members for each position, shallbe made as soon as practicable after the effective date of this subpart.The nominee for the initial public member shall be submitted to the Secretarynot later than 90 days after the first meeting of the committee.(b) Successor members. (1) The committee shall hold or cause to be heldnot later than October 1 of each year, or such other date as may be specifiedby the Secretary, a meeting or meetings of producers and handlers in eachdistrict for the purpose of designating at least one nominee for each positionas member and for each position as alternate member of the committee. Inthe alternative, the committee may conduct nominations by mail in a mannerrecommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary.(2) The names of nominees shall be submitted to the Secretary at such timeand in such manner and form as may be prescribed;(3) Only producers may participate in designating producer nominees andonly handlers may participate in designating handler nominees to the committee;(4) Only producers and handlers who are present at such nomination meetings,or represented at such meetings by a duly authorized employee, may participatein the nomination and election of nominees for members and their alternates.(5) Any person who operates in more than one district or is engaged inboth producing and handling potatoes shall elect the classification, andthe district in which to participate in designating nominees.(6) Regardless of the number of districts in which a person produces orhandles potatoes, such persons are entitled to cast only one vote for eachposition to be filled in the district and classification in which the personis eligible and elects to vote in designating nominees for committee membersand alternates. Such vote would be cast on behalf of the voter, the voter'sagents, subsidiaries, affiliates, and representatives.(c) The public member shall be nominated by the members of the committee.The committee may establish procedures for receiving names of persons tobe considered for nomination as the public member. The name of the personnominated as the public member shall be submitted by the incumbent committeeto the Secretary by November 1, or such other date recommended by the committeeand approved by the Secretary, of the year the term expires together withinformation deemed pertinent by the committee or as requested by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection.</ITAG>Committee members and alternates shall be selected by the Secretary onthe basis of representation provided for in andSection;949.20 or as modifiedpursuant to andSection;949.24.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Failure to nominate.</ITAG>If nominations are not made within the time and manner prescribed in andSection;949.25,the Secretary may, without regard to nominations, select the members andalternates on the basis of the representation provided for in andSection;949.20or as modified pursuant to andSection;949.24.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.28</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Acceptance.</ITAG>Any person prior to selection as a member or alternate member of the committeeshall qualify by filing with the Secretary a written acceptance withinthe time period specified by the Secretary of the person's willingnessto serve.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.29</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Vacancies.</ITAG>To fill any vacancy caused by the death, removal, resignation, or disqualificationof a member or alternate, a successor for the unexpired term may be selectedby the Secretary from nominations made pursuant to andSection;949.25, frompreviously unselected nominees on the current nominee list, or from othereligible persons.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Expenses.</ITAG>Members and alternates, when serving as members of the committee, shallserve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for such expenses authorizedby the committee and necessarily incurred by them in attending committeemeetings and in the performance of their duties under this part: Provided,that the committee at its discretion may request the attendance of oneor more alternates at any or all meetings notwithstanding the expected,or actual, presence of the respective members and may pay expenses as aforesaid.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedure.</ITAG>(a) A majority of all members of the committee shall be necessary to constitutea quorum or to pass any motion or approve any committee action.(b) The committee may provide for the members thereof, including the alternatemembers when acting as members, to vote by mail, telegraph, telephone,or other means of communication, provided that any such vote cast orallyshall be confirmed promptly in writing. If any assembled meeting is heldall votes shall be cast in person.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Powers.</ITAG>The committee shall have the following powers:(a) To administer the provisions of this subpart as specified herein;(b) To make rules and regulations to effectuate the terms and provisionsof this subpart;(c) To receive, investigate, and report to the Secretary complaints ofviolation of the provisions of this part; and(d) To recommend to the Secretary amendments to this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duties.</ITAG>The committee shall have, among others, the following duties:(a) As soon as practicable after the beginning of each term of office,to meet and organize, to select a chairman and such other officers as maybe necessary, to select subcommittees, to adopt such rules, regulations,and bylaws for the conduct of its business as it deems necessary, and torecommend nominees for the public member and alternate;(b) To act as intermediary between the Secretary and any producer or handler;(c) To furnish to the Secretary such available information as may be requested;(d) To appoint such employees, agents, and representatives as it may deemnecessary, to determine the compensation and define the duties of eachsuch person, and to protect the handling of committee funds.(e) To investigate from time to time and to assemble data on the growing,harvesting, shipping, and marketing conditions with respect to potatoes;(f) To recommend research and development projects to the Secretary inaccordance with this part;(g) To notify handlers of each meeting of the committee to consider recommendationsfor regulations and of all regulatory actions taken, and to provide suchnotification to producers through appropriate news releases or such othermeans as may be available to the committee;(h) To give the Secretary the same notice of meetings of the committeeand its subcommittee(s) as is given to its members;(i) To prepare a marketing policy;(j) To keep minutes, books, and records which clearly reflect all of theacts and transactions of the committee. Such minutes, books, and recordsshall be subject to examination at any time by the Secretary or the Secretary'sauthorized agent or representative. Mintues of each committee meeting shallbe reported promptly to the Secretary;(k) Prior to the beginning of each fiscal period, to submit to the Secretarya budget of projected income and expenses for such fiscal period, togetherwith a report thereon;(l) To prepare periodic statements of the financial operations of the committeeand to make copies of each such statement available to producers and handlersfor examination at the office of the committee;(m) To prepare and submit to the Secretary, an annual report, and makea copy available to each producer and grower who requests it. This annualreport shall contain at least:(1) A complete review of the regulatory operations during the fiscal period;(2) An appraisal of the effect of such regulatory operations upon the potatoindustry; and(3) Any recommendations for changes in the program.(n) To cause the books of the committee to be audited by a certified publicaccountant at least once each fiscal period and at such other times asthe committee may deem necessary or as the Secretary may request. The reportof such audit shall show the receipt and expenditure of funds collectedpursuant to this part. Two copies of such report shall be furnished tothe Secretary. A copy of each such report shall be made available at theprincipal office of the committee for inspection by producers and handlers;however, confidential information shall be removed from the report; and(o) To consult, cooperate, and exchange information with other marketingorder committees and other individuals or agencies in connection with allproper activities and objectives under this part.<ITAG tagnum="84">Expenses and Assessments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Expenses.</ITAG>The committee is authorized to incur such expenses as the Secretary mayfind are reasonable and likely to be incurred during each fiscal periodfor its maintenance and functioning, and for purposes determined to beappropriate for administration of this part. Handlers shall share expensesupon the basis of a fiscal period. Each handler's share of such expensesshall be proportionate to the ratio between the total quantity of potatoeshandled by such handler as the first handler thereof during a fiscal periodand the total quantity of potatoes handled by all handlers as first handlersthereof during such fiscal period.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Budget.</ITAG>Sixty days prior to the beginning of each fiscal period, or at such othertime as may be specified by the Secretary, the committee shall preparean estimated budget of income and expenditures necessary for its administrationof this part. The committee may recommend a rate of assessment calculatedto provide adequate funds to defray its proposed expenditures. The committeeshall submit such budget to the Secretary with an accompanying report showingthe basis for its calculations. An amended budget may be submitted as providedin andSection;949.42(c).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Assessments.</ITAG>(a) The funds to cover the committee's expenses shall be acquired by thelevying of assessments upon handlers as provided in this subpart or fromvoluntary contributions for projects pursuant to andSection;949.48. Eachperson who first handles potatoes under this part shall pay assessmentsto the committee which assessments shall be in payment of such handler'spro rata share of the committee's expenses.(b) Assessments shall be levied upon handlers at rates established by theSecretary. Such rates may be established upon the basis of the committee'sbudget, recommendations, and other available information. Such rates maybe applied to specified containers used in the production area.(c) At any time during, or subsequent to, a given fiscal period the committeemay recommend the approval of an amended budget and an increase in therate of assessment. Upon the basis of such recommendations, or other availableinformation, the Secretary may approve an amended budget and increase theestablished rate of assessment.(d) The payment of assessments for the maintenance and functioning of thecommittee may be required under this part throughout the period it is ineffect irrespective of whether particular provisions thereof are suspendedor become inoperative.(e) The committee may impose a late payment charge or an interest chargeon any handler who fails to pay any assessment in a timely manner. Suchtime and the rates shall be recommended by the committee and approved bythe Secretary.(f) In order to provide funds for the administration of this part beforesufficient operating income is available from assessments, the committeemay accept advance assessments and may also borrow money for such purpose.Advance assessments received from a handler shall be credited toward assessmentslevied against that handler during the fiscal year.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;949.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Accounting.</ITAG>(a) If, at the end of a fiscal period, the assessments collected are inexcess of expenses incurred, such excess shall be accounted for in accordancewith one of the following:(1) If such excess is not retained in a reserve, as provided in subparagraph(2) of this paragraph, it shall be refunded proportionately to the personsfrom whom it was collected. (2) The committee, with the approval of the Secretary, may carry over suchexcess into subsequent fiscal periods as a reserve: <T3>Provided</T3>, That the reserves are less than approximately two fiscalperiod's expenses. Such reserve funds may be used (i) to defray expenses,during any fiscal period, prior to the time assessment income is sufficientto cover such expenses; (ii) to cover deficits incurred during any fiscalperiod when assessment income is less than expenses; (iii) to defray expensesincurred during any period when any provisions of this part are suspendedor are inoperative; (iv) to cover necessary expenses of liquidation inthe event of termination of this part. Upon such termination, any fundsnot required to defray the necessary expenses of liquidation shall be disposedof in such manner as the Secretary may determine to be appropriate. Tothe extent practical, such funds shall be returned pro rata to the personsfrom whom such funds were collected. (b) All funds received by the committee pursuant to the provisions of thispart shall be used solely for the purposes specified herein. The Secretarymay at any time require the committee and its members to account for allreceipts and disbursements. (c) Upon the removal or expiration of the term of office of any memberof the committee, such member shall account for all receipts and disbursementsand deliver all property and funds in such member's possession to the committee,and shall execute such assignments and other instruments as may be necessaryor appropriate to vest in the committee full title to all of the property,funds, and claims vested in such member pursuant to this part. (d) The committee may make recommendations to the Secretary for one ormore of the members thereof, or any other person, to act as a trustee forholding records, funds, or any other committee property during periodsof suspension of this subpart, or during any period or periods when regulationsare not in effect and, upon determining such action is appropriate, theSecretary may direct that such person or persons shall act as trustee ortrustees for such committee.<ITAG tagnum="84">Research and Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.48 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Research and development. </ITAG>The committee, with the approval of the Secretary, may establish or providefor the establishment of production research, marketing research, and developmentprojects, not including paid advertising, designed to assist, improve,or promote the marketing, distribution, consumption, or efficient productionof potatoes. The expenses of such projects shall be paid from funds collectedpursuant to andSection; 949.42<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Marketing policy. </ITAG>Prior to beginning of each fiscal year, the committee shall submit to theSecretary a report setting forth its marketing policy for the ensuing season.Additional reports shall be submitted if it is deemed advisable by thecommittee to adopt a new marketing policy because of changes in the demandor supply situation with respect to potatoes. The committee shall publiclyannounce the submission of each such marketing policy report and copiesthereof shall be available at the committee's office for inspection byany producer or any handler. In determining each such marketing policythe committee shall give due consideration to the following: (a) Supply of potatoes by grade, size, quality, and maturity in the productionarea; (b) Estimates of supplies of potatoes in the production area and in competingareas; (c) Estimates of supplies of other competing commodities; (d) Market prices by grades, sizes, containers, and packs; (e) Anticipated marketing problems; (f) Level and trend of consumer income; and (g) Other relevant factors.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Recommendations for regulations. </ITAG>(a) Whenever the committee's marketing policy considerations deem it advisableto regulate the handling of any variety or varieties of potatoes in a mannerprovided in andSection;andSection; 949.53, 949.54, or 949.55 it shall recommendto the Secretary grade, size, quality, maturity, or pack regulation, orany combination thereof, or amendment thereto, or modification, suspension,or termination thereof. (b) In arriving at its recommendations for regulation pursuant to (a) ofthis section, the committee shall give consideration to current informationwith respect to the factors affecting the supply and demand for potatoesduring the period or periods when it is proposed that such regulationsshould be effective. With each such recommendation for regulation, thecommittee shall submit to the Secretary the data and information on whichsuch recommendation is predicated and such other available informationas the Secretary may request.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.53 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of regulations. </ITAG>(a) The Secretary shall issue regulations on the handling of potatoes wheneverthe Secretary finds from recommendations and information submitted by thecommittee, or from other available information, that such regulation wouldtend to effectuate the declared policy of the act. Such regulations may:(1) Limit the handling of particular grades, sizes, qualities, maturities,or packs of any or all varieties of potatoes, or any combination of theforegoing during any period. (2) Limit the handling of particular grades, sizes, qualities, maturitiesor packs of potatoes differently, for different varieties, for differentcontainers, for different packs, for different purposes under andSection;949.55, or for any combination of the foregoing, during any period. (3) Fix the size, capacity, weight, dimensions, pack or marking of thecontainer or containers which may be used in the packaging or handlingof potatoes, or both. (4) Establish in terms of grades, sizes, or both, minimum standards ofquality and maturity during any period when season average prices are expectedto exceed the parity level. (b) The Secretary shall notify the committee of each regulation issuedpursuant to this section. The committee shall give reasonable notice thereofto handlers. (c) Nothing in this subpart shall authorize any regulation eliminatingshipment of potatoes in bulk.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.54 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Modification, suspension, or termination of regulations. </ITAG>(a) In the event the committee at any time finds that, by reason of changedconditions, any regulations issued pursuant to andSection; 949.53 shouldbe modified, suspended, or terminated, it shall so recommend to the Secretary.(b) Whenever the Secretary finds, from the recommendations and informationsubmitted by the committee or from other available information, that aregulation should be modified, suspended, or terminated with respect toany or all shipments in order to effectuate the declared policy of theact, the Secretary shall modify, suspend, or terminate such regulation.If the Secretary finds that a regulation obstructs or does not tend toeffectuate the declared policy of the act, the Secretary shall suspendor terminate such regulation. On the same basis and in like manner theSecretary may terminate any such modification or suspension.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.55 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handling for special purposes. </ITAG>(a) Upon the basis of recommendations and information submitted by thecommittee, or other available information, the Secretary, may modify, suspend,or terminate requirements in effect pursuant to andSection; 949.42 or andSection;andSection;949.51 to 949.53 inclusive, or andSection; 949.60 or any combination thereof,to facilitate handling of potatoes for: (1) Relief or charity; (2) Livestock feed; (3) Export; (4) Seed; (5) Potatoes, other than certified seed, sold to a producer exclusivelyfor planting within specific geographic limits; (6) Other purposes recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary.(b) The committee, with the approval of the Secretary, shall prescriberules and regulations to prevent potatoes handled pursuant to this sectionfrom entering trade channels other than those authorized by regulationsand by such rules as may be necessary and incidental thereto.<ITAG tagnum="84">Inspection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspection and certification. </ITAG>(a) During any period in which the handling of potatoes is regulated pursuantto andSection;andSection; 949.53 and 949.55, inclusive, no handler shall handlepotatoes unless such potatoes are inspected by an authorized representativeof the Federal or a Federal-State Inspection Service and are covered bya valid inspection certificate, except when relieved of such requirementsby andSection;andSection; 949.54, 949.55, or 949.60(b). (b) The committee may, with the approval of the Secretary, issue rulesrequiring inspection on regraded, resorted or repacked lots, or providingfor special inspection requirements or relief therefrom. Such rules mayprovide distinctions, insofar as practical, between handling at shippingpoint and handling in receiving markets within the production area. (c) Upon recommendation of the committee and approval by the Secretary,any or all potatoes so inspected and certified shall be identified by appropriateseals, stamps, or tags to be affixed to the container by the handler underthe direction and supervision of a Federal or Federal-State Inspector orthe committee. Master containers may bear the identification instead ofthe individual containers within said master container. (d) Insofar as the requirements of this section are concerned, the lengthof time for which an inspection certificate is valid may be establishedby the committee with the approval of the Secretary. (e) When potatoes are inspected in accordance with the requirements ofthis section, a copy of each inspection certificate issued shall be madeavailable to the committee by the inspection service. (f) The committee may recommend and the Secretary may require that no handlershall transport or cause the transportation of potatoes by motor vehicleor by other means unless such shipment is accompanied by a copy of theinspection certificate issued thereon, or other evidence of inspectionacceptable to the Secretary such as a Positive Lot Identification stamp,to indicate that such inspection has been performed. Such certificate ordocument shall be surrendered to such authority as may be designated.<ITAG tagnum="84">Reports and Recordkeeping</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.80 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reports and recordkeeping. </ITAG>Upon request of the committee, made with the approval of the Secretary,each handler shall furnish to the committee, in such manner and form andat such time as it may prescribe, such reports and other information asmay be necessary for the committee to perform its duties under this part.(a) Such reports may include, but are not necessarily limited to, the following:(1) The quantities of potatoes received by variety by a handler duringany or all periods of a season; (2) The quantities disposed of by the handler, segregated as to quantitiessubject to regulation, and where necessary, segregated as to types of outletsand special or modified regulations applicable to alternative outlets,and including quantities not subject to regulation; (3) The date of each such disposition and the identification of the carriertransporting such potatoes; (4) Information essential to identification of any or all specific quantities,lots, and disposition or potatoes handled under andSection;andSection; 949.53to 949.55, inclusive, which may include identification of inspection certificates,exemption certificates, certificates of privilege, or other appropriateidentification, including the destination of each special shipment, wherenecessary. (b) All such reports shall be held under appropriate protective classificationand custody by the committee, or duly appointed employees thereof, so thatthe information contained therein which may adversely affect the competitiveposition of any handler in relation to other handlers will not be disclosed.Compilations of general reports from data submitted by handlers is authorized,subject to the prohibition of disclosure of an individual handler identityor operations.(c) Each handler shall maintain for at least 2 succeeding years such recordsand documents on potatoes received by such handler as may be necessaryto verify reports submitted to the committee pursuant to this section.(d) for the purpose of assuring compliance with recordkeeping requirementsand verifying reports of handlers, the Secretary and the committee, throughtheir duly authorized employees or agents, shall have access to any premiseswhere applicable records are located, and where potatoes are handled, andat any time during reasonable business hours shall be permitted to inspectsuch handler's premises and any potatoes held by such handler and examineany and all records of such persons with respect to matters within thepurview of this part. <ITAG tagnum="84">Compliance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.81</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance.</ITAG>No person shall handle potatoes except in conformity with the provisionsof this subpart and the regulations issued thereunder.<ITAG tagnum="84">Miscellaneous Provision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.82</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Right of the Secretary.</ITAG>The members of the committee (including successors and alternates) andany agent or employee appointed or employed by the committee shall be subjectto removal or suspension by the Secretary at any time. Each and every order,regulation, decision, determination or other act of the committee shallbe subject to the continuing right of the Secretary to disapprove of thesame at any time. Upon such disapproval, the disapproved action of thecommittee shall be deemed null and void, except as to acts done in reliancethereon or in compliance therewith prior to such disapproval by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.84</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination or suspension.</ITAG>(a) The Secretary may terminate or suspend the operation of any or allof the provisions of this part whenever the Secretary finds that such provisionsdo not tend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act.(b) Producer referendum. (1) The Secretary shall terminate in accordancewith section 8(c)(16)B of the Act, the provisions of this part at the endof any fiscal period whenever the Secretary finds that such terminationis favored by a majority of producers, who during a representative period,as determined by the Secretary have been engaged in the production of potatoesfor market: <T3>Provided</T3>, That such majority has, during such representative period,produced for market more than fifty percent of the volume of such potatoesproduced for market: <T3>Provided further</T3>, That termination shall be announced before thebeginning of the ensuing fiscal period.(2) The Secretary shall conduct a referendum every sixth fiscal year withthe first such referendum to be conducted within 6 years from the effectivedate of this section, to ascertain whether continuance of this subpartis favored by producers. The Secretary may terminate the provisions ofthis part at the end of any fiscal year in which the Secretary has foundthat continuance of this subpart is not favored by producers who, duringa representative period determined by the Secretary, have been engagedin the production for market of potatoes in the production area. Such terminationof the part shall be announced on or before the end of the fiscal year.(c) The provisions of this part shall in any event terminate whenever theprovisions of the Act authorizing them cease to be in effect.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proceedings after termination.</ITAG>(a) Upon the termination of the provisions of this part the then functioningmembers of the committee shall continue as joint trustees for the purposeof liquidating the affairs of the committee of all funds and property thenin the possession of or under control of the committee, including claimsfor any funds unpaid or property not delivered at the time of such termination.Action by said trusteeship shall require the concurrence of a majorityof the said trustees.(b) The said trustees shall continue in such capacity until dischargedby the Secretary; shall from time to time account for all receipts anddisbursements and deliver all property on hand, together with all booksand records of said committee and of the trustees, to such person as theSecretary may direct; and shall upon the request of the Secretary, executesuch assignments or other instruments necessary or appropriate to vestin such person full title and right to all of the funds, property, andclaims vested in said committee or the trustees pursuant to this part.(c) Any person to whom funds, property, or claims have been transferredor delivered by the committee or its members pursuant to this section shallbe subject to the same obligations imposed upon the members of the committeesand upon the said trustees.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.86</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effect of termination or amendment.</ITAG>Unless otherwise expressly provided by the Secretary, the termination ofthis subpart or of any regulation issued pursuant to this subpart or theissuance of any amendments to either thereof, shall not (a) affect or waiveany right, duty, obligation, or liability which shall have arisen or whichmay thereafter arise in connection with any provision of this subpart orany regulation issued under this subpart; or (b) release or extinguishany violation of this subpart or of any regulations issued under this subpart;or (c) affect or impair any rights or remedies of the Secretary or of anyother person with respect to any such violations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.87</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of immunities.</ITAG>The benefits, privileges and immunities conferred upon any person by virtueof this part shall cease upon the termination of this part, except withrespect to acts done under and during the existence of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.88 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Agents.</ITAG>The Secretary may, by designation in writing, name any person, includingany officer or employee of the United States, or name any agency in theUnited States Department of Agriculture, to act as the Secretary's agentor representative in connection with any of the provisions of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.89</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Derogation.</ITAG>Nothing contained in this part is, or shall be construed to be, in derogationor in modification of the rights of the Secretary or of the United Statesto exercise any powers granted by the Act or otherwise, or in accordancewith such powers, to act in the premises whenever such action is deemedadvisable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Personal liability.</ITAG>No member or alternate of the committee or any employee or agent thereof,shall be held personally responsible, either individually or jointly withothers, in any way whatsoever, to any handler or to any person for errorsin judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission,as such member, alternate, agent, or employee, except for acts of dishonesty,willful misconduct or gross negligence.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.91</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Separability.</ITAG>If any provision of this part is declared invalid or the applicabilitythereof to any person, circumstance or thing is held invalid, the validityof the remainder of this subpart, or the applicability thereof to any otherperson, circumstance or thing shall not be affected thereby.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 949.92</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendments.</ITAG>Amendments to this subpart may be proposed from time to time by the committeeor by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="84">Marketing Agreement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">*andSection; 949.97</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Counterparts.</ITAG>This agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts and when one counterpartis signed by the Secretary, all such counterparts shall constitute, whentaken together, one and the same instrument as if all signatures were containedin one original.<ITAG tagnum="80">*andSection; 949.98</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional parties.</ITAG>After the effective date thereof, any handler may become a party to thisagreement if a counterpart is executed by such handler and delivered tothe Secretary. This agreement shall take effect as to such new contractingpart at the time such counterpart is delivered to the Secretary, and thebenefits, privileges and immunities conferred by this agreement shall thenbe effective as to such new contracting party.<ITAG tagnum="80">*andSection; 949.99</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Order with marketing agreement.</ITAG>Each signatory hereby requests the Secretary to issue, pursuant to theact, an order providing for regulating the handling of potatoes in thesame manner as is provided for in the agreement.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: January 25, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">J. Patrick Boyle,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-2108 Filed 1-30-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-02-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>